

Contract and Agreement Category List











































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog







Sample Contract Categories 

a

b

c

d

e

f

g

h

i

j

k

l

m

n

o

p

q

r

s

t

u

v

w

x

y

z


abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz


337k
		Delaware
	

277k
		New York
	

113k
		California
	

70k
		Texas
	

68k
		Agreement
	

62k
		Nevada
	

46k
		Florida
	

44k
		Maryland
	

40k
		Illinois
	

38k
		Employment Agreement
	

38k
		Washington
	

37k
		Amended And Restated
	

36k
		Massachusetts
	

34k
		New Jersey
	

33k
		Pennsylvania
	

28k
		Georgia
	

28k
		Colorado
	

26k
		Ohio
	

25k
		Minnesota
	

25k
		Virginia
	

21k
		North Carolina
	

20k
		Incentive Plan
	

19k
		Credit Agreement
	

19k
		Amendment
	

16k
		Connecticut
	

16k
		Michigan
	

15k
		Indiana
	

14k
		Registration Rights Agreement
	

14k
		Recitals
	

13k
		Tennessee
	

13k
		Arizona
	

13k
		Missouri
	

12k
		Purchase Agreement
	

12k
		Promissory Note
	

12k
		Indenture
	

11k
		Warrant
	

11k
		Louisiana
	

11k
		Kansas
	

11k
		Utah
	

11k
		Wisconsin
	

10k
		Oklahoma
	

9k
		Securities Purchase Agreement
	

9k
		Agreement And Plan Of Merger
	

8k
		Iowa
	

8k
		Supplemental Indenture
	

8k
		Note
	

8k
		Equity Incentive Plan
	

7k
		Kentucky
	

7k
		Stock Purchase Agreement
	

7k
		Alabama
	














×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.








 



NRG Energy, Inc. Prices NRG and Texas Genco Bond Tender Offers | Business Wire


























































NRG Energy, Inc. Prices NRG and Texas Genco Bond Tender Offers






January 25, 2006 09:53 PM Eastern Standard Time



				PRINCETON, N.J.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Jan. 25, 2006--NRG Energy, Inc. (NYSE:NRG) today announced the pricing terms of its previously announced tender offer for any and all outstanding $1,080,412,000 aggregate principal amount of its 8% second priority senior secured notes due 2013 (CUSIP No. 629377AS1) (the "NRG Notes") and related consent solicitation under NRG's Offer to Purchase and Consent Solicitation Statement dated December 15, 2005 relating to the NRG Notes. NRG also announced today the pricing terms of its previously announced tender offer for any and all outstanding $1,125,000,000 aggregate principal amount of Texas Genco LLC's and Texas Genco Financing Corp.'s 6.875% senior notes due 2014 (CUSIP Nos. 882444AA0, U88243AA5) (the "Texas Genco Notes") and related consent solicitation under NRG's Offer to Purchase and Consent Solicitation Statement dated December 15, 2005 relating to the Texas Genco Notes.  In addition, NRG today announced that it is extending the tender offer for the NRG Notes. The tender offer for the NRG Notes will now expire at 8:00 a.m., New York City time, on February 2, 2006, unless further extended (the "NRG Notes Expiration Date").  NRG also announced today that it is extending the tender offer for the Texas Genco Notes. The tender offer for the Texas Genco Notes will now expire at 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on February 2, 2006, unless further extended (the "Texas Genco Notes Expiration Date").  Tender Offer and Consent Solicitation for NRG Notes  The total consideration for each $1,000 principal amount of NRG Notes (the "NRG Notes Total Consideration"), which will be payable in respect of the NRG Notes that are accepted for payment and that were validly tendered on or prior to December 29, 2005 (the "Consent Date"), will be $1,117.17 per $1,000.00 principal amount of the NRG Notes, which includes a $30.00 consent payment payable only in respect of NRG Notes that were tendered on or prior to the Consent Date. The NRG Notes Total Consideration was determined as of 2:00 p.m., New York City time, today, and was calculated based on the present value of $1,040.00 and all future interest payments on the NRG Notes to December 15, 2008, minus accrued and unpaid interest from the last date on which interest has been paid, up to, but not including, the scheduled payment date. The present value was determined using the yield on the 3.375% U.S. Treasury Note due December 15, 2008, which was 4.3860% as of 2:00 p.m., New York City time, today, plus a fixed spread of 50 basis points. Holders who validly tender their NRG Notes after the Consent Date and on or prior to 8:00 a.m., New York City time, on the NRG Notes Expiration Date, unless extended, will be eligible to receive the tender offer consideration, which consists of the NRG Notes Total Consideration less the consent payment (the "NRG Notes Tender Offer Consideration").  The scheduled payment date for the NRG Notes will be February 2, 2006 and the calculation of the NRG Notes Total Consideration and NRG Notes Tender Offer Consideration is based on this date. In addition to the NRG Notes Total Consideration or NRG Notes Tender Offer Consideration, as the case may be, tendering holders will receive accrued and unpaid interest to, but not including, February 2, 2006.  Tender Offer and Consent Solicitation for Texas Genco Notes  The total consideration for each $1,000 principal amount of Texas Genco Notes (the "Texas Genco Notes Total Consideration"), which will be payable in respect of the Texas Genco Notes that are accepted for payment and that were validly tendered on or prior to the "Consent Date", will be $1,086.00 per $1,000.00 principal amount of the Texas Genco Notes, which includes a $30.00 consent payment payable only in respect of Texas Genco Notes that were tendered on or prior to the Consent Date. The Texas Genco Notes Total Consideration for the Texas Genco Notes was determined as of 2:00 p.m., New York City time, today, and was calculated based on the sum of (i) 40% of the Equity Claw-back Price and (ii) 60% of the Fixed Spread Price. The "Equity Claw-back Price" is equal to $1,068.75 per $1,000 principal amount of Texas Genco Notes validly tendered. The "Fixed Spread Price" is equal to the present value of $1,034.38 and all future interest payments on the Texas Genco Notes to December 15, 2009, minus accrued and unpaid interest from the last date on which interest has been paid, up to, but not including, the scheduled payment date. The present value was determined using the yield on the 3.5% U.S. Treasury Note due December 15, 2009, which was 4.3930% as of 2:00 p.m., New York City time, today, plus a fixed spread of 50 basis points. Holders who validly tender their Texas Genco Notes after the Consent Date and on or prior to 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on the Texas Genco Notes Expiration Date, unless extended, will be eligible to receive the tender offer consideration, which consists of the Texas Genco Notes Total Consideration less the consent payment (the "Texas Genco Notes Tender Offer Consideration").  The scheduled payment date for the Texas Genco Notes will be February 3, 2006 and the calculation of the Texas Genco Notes Total Consideration and Texas Genco Notes Tender Offer Consideration is based on this date. In addition to the Texas Genco Notes Total Consideration or the Texas Genco Notes Tender Offer Consideration, as the case may be, tendering holders will receive accrued and unpaid interest to, but not including, February 3, 2006.  General  As of 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on January 24, 2006, NRG had received valid tenders from holders of approximately $1,078,141,353 in aggregate principal amount of the NRG Notes, representing approximately 99.8% of the outstanding NRG Notes, and had received valid tenders from holders of $1,125,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of the Texas Genco Notes, representing 100% of the outstanding Texas Genco Notes.  Consummation of each tender offer is conditioned upon the satisfaction of certain conditions, including (1) NRG having obtained funds sufficient to pay the consideration, costs and expenses of the tender offers and consent solicitations from the financing transactions related to the pending acquisition of Texas Genco LLC, (2) the consummation of the pending acquisition of Texas Genco LLC, and (3) certain other customary conditions. There can be no assurance that any of such conditions will be met. NRG may waive some or all of these conditions in its sole discretion (other than consummation of the acquisition of Texas Genco, which will not be waived in the case of the tender offer and consent solicitation for the Texas Genco Notes). NRG may amend, extend or terminate each of the tender offers and consent solicitations in its sole discretion.  The complete terms and conditions of the tender offers and consent solicitations are described in the Offer to Purchase and Consent Solicitation Statement dated December 15, 2005 relating to the NRG Notes, and the Offer to Purchase and Consent Solicitation Statement dated December 15, 2005 relating to the Texas Genco Notes, copies of which may be obtained from MacKenzie Partners, Inc., the information agent for the tender offers and consent solicitations, at 800.322.2885 (U.S. toll free) and 212.929.5500 (collect).  NRG has engaged Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated and Citigroup Corporate and Investment Banking to act as dealer managers and solicitation agents in connection with the tender offers and consent solicitations. Questions regarding the tender offers and consent solicitations may be directed to Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated at 800.624.1808 (U.S. toll free) and 212.761.1457 (collect), or Citigroup Corporate and Investment Banking at 800.558.3745 (U.S. toll free) and 212.723.6106 (collect). Law Debenture Trust Company of New York is acting as the Depositary for the tender offers and consent solicitations and can be contacted at 212.750.0888.  This announcement is neither an offer to purchase nor a solicitation of an offer to sell any securities. This announcement is also not a solicitation of consents to the proposed amendments to the respective indentures. No recommendation is made as to whether holders of NRG Notes or holders of Texas Genco Notes should tender their notes.  NRG Energy, Inc. owns and operates a diverse portfolio of power-generating facilities, primarily in the Northeast, South Central and Western regions of the United States. Its operations include baseload, intermediate, peaking, and cogeneration facilities, thermal energy production and energy resource recovery facilities. NRG also has ownership interests in generating facilities in Australia and Germany.  Certain statements contained herein may constitute forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933 and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Such forward-looking typically can be identified by the use of words such as "will," "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "forecast," "plan," "believe" and similar terms. Although NRG believes that its expectations are reasonable, it can give no assurance that these expectations will prove to have been correct, and actual results may vary materially. Factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated above include, among others: risks and uncertainties related to the capital markets generally, and the availability of financing for NRG's pending acquisition of Texas Genco.  NRG undertakes no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. The foregoing review of factors that could cause NRG's actual results to differ materially from those contemplated in the forward-looking statements included herein should be considered in connection with information regarding risks and uncertainties that may affect NRG's future results included in NRG's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission at www.sec.gov.


Contacts
					NRG Energy, Inc., PrincetonInvestor Relations: Nahla Azmy, 609-524-4526or Katy Sullivan, 609-524-4527 orMedia Relations: Meredith Moore, 609-524-4522or Jay Mandel, 609-524-4525
				
			











Contacts
			NRG Energy, Inc., PrincetonInvestor Relations: Nahla Azmy, 609-524-4526or Katy Sullivan, 609-524-4527 orMedia Relations: Meredith Moore, 609-524-4522or Jay Mandel, 609-524-4525
		





 
 

 






Search




Advanced News Search

Advanced News Search













Log In
Sign Up























TEXAS GENCO INC. IPO - NASDAQ.com

































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search






















Home > 
    Markets > 
    IPOs  > 
    Company IPO Overview





TEXAS GENCO INC. IPO




Overview




News Headlines




Financials & Filings




Experts















Key Data
Use of Proceeds
Competitors




Company Overview


Company Name
TEXAS GENCO INC.


Company Address
12301 KURLAND DRIVEHOUSTON, TX 77034


Company Phone
713-795-6000


Company Website
www.txgenco.com


CEO
Jack Fusco


Employees  (as of 6/30/2005) 
1203


State of Inc
DE


Fiscal Year End
12/31


Status
Withdrawn (2/3/2006)


Proposed Symbol
 -- 


Exchange
NASDAQ


Share Price
 -- 


Shares Offered
 -- 


Offer Amount
$600,000,000.00


Total Expenses
 -- 


Shares Over Alloted
 -- 


Shareholder Shares Offered
 -- 


Shares Outstanding
 -- 


Lockup Period (days)
180


Lockup Expiration
 -- 


Quiet Period Expiration
 -- 


CIK
0001328992




We estimate that the net proceeds to us from this offering, after deducting
underwriting discounts and estimated offering expenses, will be approximately
$       million, or approximately $       million if the underwriters exercise
their option to purchase additional shares in full. Texas Genco Inc. will use
the proceeds from this offering to purchase       newly issued membership units
from Texas Genco Holdings LLC, or       membership units if the underwriters
exercise their option to purchase additional shares in full. We intend to use
all of these net proceeds, including any net proceeds received upon the exercise
by the underwriters of their option to purchase additional shares, to pay
special distributions to our existing equityholders.


The ERCOT market is highly competitive. We have approximately 80
competitors that include generation companies affiliated with Texas-based
utilities, independent power producers, municipal and co-operative generators,
owners of co-generation plants and wholesale power marketers. We are an
independent power producer, which means that we generate power. Generation
companies affiliated with utilities are power producers that are affiliated with
utilities. Municipal and co-operative generators also generate power but use
most of it to deliver power to their municipal or co-operative power customers.
Owners of co-generation plants produce power primarily for their own
consumption. Wholesale power marketers do not own generation; rather they buy
power from generators or other market participants and resell it to retail
providers or other market participants. These competitors compete with each
other and us by buying and selling wholesale power in the ERCOT market, entering
into bilateral contracts and/or selling to aggregated retail customers.

     Competition in the ERCOT market is affected by, among other factors, the
amount of generation and transmission capacity in the market. As of
September 30, 2004, our plants, including our share of STP, provided
approximately 14% of the aggregate net generation capacity serving the ERCOT
market. According to ERCOT, the independent system operator for the electric
market that services 85% of the electric demand in Texas, we are the
second-largest generation company within the ERCOT market and the largest owner
of power plants in the ERCOT market's Houston Zone based on total capacity. We
participate in three zones in the ERCOT market, which we believe benefits our
solid-fuel baseload plants and is a source of competitive advantage for our
business. Our competition is based primarily on price but we also may compete
based on product flexibility. Product flexibility means, for example, that
rather than selling power for delivery 7 days a week, 24 hours a day, 365 days a
year, we can shape the product for a customer's needs, such as selling power for
delivery only during the peak hours of consumption. Our gas-fired units allow us
to design and sell products for customers who have an obligation to meet load
and need to shape their power purchase to match their load as it increases and
decreases. The ERCOT market has had a very significant period of development  
of new power plants since January 2000 and hence currently has reserve margins 
that have exceeded 25% according to information published by ERCOT. Most of 
these plants were new combined cycle natural gas-fired plants and have not 
affected the dispatch of our solid-fuel baseload plants. We do not expect the 
growth of the generation supply in the ERCOT market to continue at the rate it 
has since 2000. According to data published by the Public Utility Commission 
of Texas, 2004 was the last year expected to see such growth, with about 2,500 
MW added last year, and approximately 33% of previously announced new generation 
capacity, equivalent to 17,801 MW, has been canceled or postponed since 2001.


Company Description
We are a wholesale electric power generation company engaged in the
ownership and operation of a diverse portfolio of power plants in the state of
Texas. According to the Electric Reliability Council of Texas, the independent
system operator for the electric market that services 85% of the electric


 demand
in Texas, we are the second-largest generation company within that market and
the largest owner of power plants in the Houston zone of that market based on
total generation capacity. We sell power and related products to wholesale
purchasers such as retail electric providers, power trading organizations,
municipal utilities, electric power co-operatives and other power generation
companies.

     We currently own 48 operating generation units at nine power generation
plants, including an undivided 44.0% interest in two nuclear generation units at
South Texas Project Electric Generating Station. Our generation plants are
diversified across fuel sources, technology and geographic regions within the
Electric Reliability Council of Texas market. The substantial majority of our
revenues and cash flows are realized from the sale of power from eight units at
our three solid fuel (coal, lignite and uranium) power plants - W. A. Parish,
Limestone and South Texas Project Electric Generating Station. Because
generation units are generally dispatched in order of lowest cost and
approximately 73% of the net generation capacity in our market is from
higher-cost natural gas-fired units, we expect these eight baseload units to
operate nearly 100% of the time they are available.

     Our management team has implemented a strategy of creating a stable base of
operating cash flows through a combination of forward fixed price power sales,
natural gas price swap agreements (which have the effect of hedging the price we
would receive for additional future power sales and therefore our revenues), and
forward solid fuel and fuel transportation purchases. As of August 19, 2005, we
had hedged the price we will receive for approximately 82% of the power that we
expect to generate at our solid-fuel baseload units from 2005 through
2009-including 74% under fixed price power sales contracts and 8% using natural
gas price swap agreements. These forward power sales and natural gas price swap
agreements, combined with sales and price swaps in 2010, represent approximately
$7.5 billion in total future revenues. In addition, we had contracted to
purchase at future dates under fixed price contracts (with
contractually-specified price adjustments) enough solid fuel to provide for
approximately 83% of our expected generation from our solid-fuel baseload plants
from 2005 through 2009.

     We believe that the stable cash flows generated by this combination of
forward power sales and natural gas price swap agreements and forward solid fuel
and fuel transportation purchases create a strong platform for growth in our
equity value, initially through reducing the level of debt in our capital
structure and ultimately through additions to our generation business in Texas
and expansion into other attractive markets. In addition, our portfolio of
natural gas-fired units that serve the Houston market provides opportunities for
us to capture additional revenues through offering capacity or similar products
to retail electric providers and others, selling power at prevailing market
prices during periods of peak demand and providing ancillary services in support
of system reliability.

     As of June 30, 2005, the aggregate net generation capacity of our portfolio
of operating assets was 10,939 MW, of which 5,220 MW represented the generation
capacity of our solid-fuel baseload plants. Our three low-cost and efficient
solid-fuel baseload plants produced 84% of our total megawatt hours sold for the
twelve months ended June 30, 2005, giving pro forma effect to the acquisitions
of our generation plants (including our acquisition of an additional 13.2%
undivided interest in South Texas Project Electric Generating Station) and generated 
a substantial majority of our revenues and cash flow. See "Business-Our Generation
Plants" for more information about our portfolio of generation plants. For the
twelve months ended June 30, 2005, giving pro forma effect to the acquisitions
of our generation plants (other than our acquisition of an additional 13.2%
undivided interest in South Texas Project Electric Generating Station, which is
accounted for as an asset acquisition and therefore is not included in the pro
forma statement of operations) and the related financings, and to the corporate
reorganization we will undertake in connection with this offering as if these
transactions had occurred on July 1, 2004, we had revenues of $2,347.8 million,
income before minority interest of $       and net income of $       . 
Recent Initiatives

     Since we signed definitive documentation in July 2004 to acquire Texas
Genco Holdings, Inc. from CenterPoint Energy, Inc. our new management team has
undertaken a variety of initiatives to materially enhance the value of our
business, including:

        º executing new forward power sales and natural gas price swap
          agreements at attractive prices that we expect will generate an
          additional $6.1 billion of revenues through 2010;

        º implementing initiatives that we expect will reduce annual operation
          and maintenance expenses after fiscal 2005 by approximately
          $130 million as compared to our pro forma operation and maintenance
          expenses of $529 million, which includes approximately $30 million of
          annual expenses for our additional 13.2% ownership interest in the
          South Texas Project Electric Generating Station acquired May 19, 2005,
          for the twelve months ended June 30, 2005, through a reduction in the
          workforce, the assumption of services previously provided by
          CenterPoint Energy, Inc. and Reliant Energy, Inc., the elimination of
          one-time restructuring costs and the suspension of operations of
          uneconomic natural gas-fired units;

        º effecting the acquisition, funded from cash on the balance sheet, of
          an additional 338 MW of ownership interest in South Texas Project
          Electric Generating Station; and

        º selling non-core assets.

---------
     Texas Genco Inc.'s principal executive offices are located at 1301
McKinney, Suite 2300, Houston, Texas 77010. Our telephone number is
(713) 795-6000.


Full Description

The IPO profiles may contain historical records. Please visit the latest IPOs for the most recent information.




Company Financials



Revenue
 -- 


Net Income
 -- 


Total Assets
$1






Total Liabilities
 -- 


Stockholders' Equity
$1




Company Filings

                                    Viewing: 1 - 4 Total: 4
					            



Company Name
Form Type
Date Received
View



TEXAS GENCO INC.
RW
2/3/2006
Filing



TEXAS GENCO INC.
S-1/A
9/1/2005
Filing



TEXAS GENCO INC.
S-1/A
7/28/2005
Filing



TEXAS GENCO INC.
S-1
6/6/2005
Filing







Experts


Auditor
Deloitte & Touche LLP


Auditor
Deloitte LLP


Company Counsel
Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP


Lead Underwriter
Goldman, Sachs & Co


Lead Underwriter
Goldman, Sachs & Co.


Transfer Agent
Mellon Investor Services LLC


Underwriter Counsel
Latham & Watkins LLP






                                There are no news stories for this IPO at this time.
                            












Today's Market Activity





NASDAQ

6374.68


-7.51
 ▼ 
0.12%





DJIA

21830.31


33.76
 ▲ 
0.15%





S&P 500

2472.10


-3.32
 ▼ 
0.13%










Data as of Jul 28, 2017


Try for Free: NASDAQ LiveQuotes Platform



View All















Latest News Headlines




                            Sprint proposes merger with Charter Communications - WSJ
                        



	                     7:53PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Union cheers as trucks kept out of U.S. self-driving legislation
                        



	                     6:57PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            RPT-Hundreds of U.S. counties at risk for no Obamacare insurer in 2018
                        



	                     6:48PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Wells Fargo faces angry questions after new sales abuses uncovered
                        



	                     6:41PM ET  - Reuters
	                





View All Latest Headlines

















Upcoming Earnings



Company
Expected Report Date




AAPL
Jul 25, 2017


ODFL
Jul 27, 2017


FB
Jul 26, 2017


TSLA
Aug 2, 2017


T
Jul 20, 2017


AMZN
Jul 27, 2017


VZ
Jul 27, 2017


GE
Jul 21, 2017





Earnings Calendar


























CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX






































  TGN Stock Quote - Texas Genco Holdings Inc - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Texas Genco Holdings Inc   TGN:US      Acquired   TGN:US was acquired by NRG:US   USD             Volume   0                  


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Volume   0    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   -    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   3.76    Market Cap (USD)   -    Shares Outstanding  (m)   80.000    Price/Sales (TTM)   -    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   -                Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Texas Genco Holdings, Inc. sells electric generation capacity, energy, and ancillary services. The Company owns and operates electric power-generating facilities located in Southeast Texas. Texas Genco owns a partial interest in a nuclear generating plant.    Address  1111 LouisianaHouston, TX 77002United States   Phone  1-713-207-3000   Website   -              


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Texas Genco LLC / Texas Genco Financing Corp: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback























texas genco llc / texas genco financing corp
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Utilities
Industry: Utilities
Sub-Industry: Power Generation





Corporate Information
Address:



Phone:
-


Fax:
-























From The Web












Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data

































         
	NRG Energy to Combine with Texas Genco Creating the Leading Competitive Power Generation Company in the United States
    



















9d4b21c6-35a8-4ce7-97b5-772a310620b6






Media
Stay up to date with the latest Blackstone news





  
Overview
  
Press Releases
  
Market Commentary
  
Videos
  
Blog
 
Press Releases    Receive Press Releases by Email



            Oct 02, 2005
        


            NRG Energy to Combine with Texas Genco Creating the Leading Competitive Power Generation Company in the United States
        

 Transaction Valued at $5.8 Billion 
PRINCETON, NJ and HOUSTON, TX, October 2, 2005 — NRG Energy, Inc. (NYSE: NRG) and Texas Genco LLC have entered into a definitive agreement for NRG to acquire all the outstanding equity of Texas Genco LLC for approximately $5.8 billion, comprised of approximately $4 billion in cash and $1.8 billion in common and preferred stock. In addition, NRG will assume approximately $2.5 billion of Texas Genco debt.
The combination of NRG and Texas Genco will create the premier wholesale power generation company in the United States. With Texas Genco, NRG will have the broadest geographic reach and an unmatched portfolio of quality power generation assets of any independent power producer, with a significant presence in the key competitive wholesale power markets in the United States. The combined company will also be a leading fuel diversified energy provider. Further, this combination is expected to drive substantially greater earnings and cash flow per share for NRG that will enhance the Company’s financial strength and flexibility and enable it to pursue additional growth opportunities.
“Texas Genco is an ideal strategic fit with NRG,” said David Crane, NRG’s President and Chief Executive Officer. “The strengths of its people and its assets align closely with our own, bolstering NRG’s platform for growth and our ability to drive value for our shareholders.”
“This is an exciting combination for our employees, shareholders and the communities in which we operate,” said Texas Genco Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Jack Fusco. “Like NRG, we at Texas Genco have an unwavering focus on safety, teamwork, operational excellence, and value creation. I am confident that the combined company will set new standards and achieve new heights.”
Financial and Strategic Benefits:
Purchase Price Drivers: The purchase price paid for Texas Genco was based on their near term substantially hedged portfolio and a conservative view on longer term gas prices. The $8.3 billion enterprise value divided by Texas Genco’s expected earnings in 2006 results in a purchase price multiple below NRG’s current trading multiple. Furthermore, the $8.3 billion purchase price includes the present value of approximately $500 million in after tax cash benefits that are expected to result from the increased tax basis of the Texas Genco assets that occur at transaction closing.
Immediate Accretion to Earnings and Cash Flow: Post closing, NRG expects the transaction to be immediately and significantly accretive to both earnings per share and cash flow per share.
Stability and Growth of Earnings and Cash Flow: Texas Genco has sold forward, on average, 82%,of its available baseload capacity over the next four years, providing a stable source of earnings and cash flow to the combined entity.
Strong, Flexible Capital Structure: The transaction is expected to be financed through a combination of debt and equity that will enable the company to achieve a net debt to total capital ratio within NRG's target range of 45-55% by year end 2006. Additionally, Texas Genco's collateral program will meaningfully enhance the Company's liquidity position and hedging capacity. NRG intends to refinance the first lien debt of both companies. Upon completion of the transaction, the Company expects to have approximately 141.1 million common shares outstanding, of which approximately 35.4 million shares will be divided among and held independently by each of the current owners of Texas Genco.
The equity component of the consideration is valued at approximately $1.8 billion, and consists of approximately 35.4 million shares of common stock, plus approximately nine million additional shares of common stock, which can be delivered at NRG’s option in either common stock or the equivalent in cash or preferred stock.
Morgan Stanley Senior Funding, Inc. and Citigroup Global Markets, Inc. have provided committed financing to NRG in support of financing the cash portion of the transaction.
Enhanced Platform for Growth in Key Market Regions: Texas Genco is the second-largest generation company within ERCOT, one of the nation’s largest and fastest growing power markets. Texas Genco’s plants, including its 44% interest in the South Texas Project nuclear generating facility, provide approximately 14% of the aggregate net generation capacity in the ERCOT market, a state that has been a pioneer in the establishment of a competitive wholesale electric power market.
With Texas Genco, NRG will have a U.S. generation portfolio of approximately 23,920 MW of capacity that is fuel, dispatch and geographically diverse. The Company will have a strong asset position in all of the key competitive wholesale markets in the United States, including the Northeast, South Central, California and Texas.
Industry Restructuring: This transaction represents the first important step in the necessary and long-awaited restructuring of the wholesale power generation industry.
“This transaction represents a major milestone for our Company and our industry. With Texas Genco, we will further increase our financial strength and flexibility and enhance our geographic breadth, technical expertise and diversity of fuel sources,” Crane continued. “We believe these advantages will enable NRG to make even more of a difference as our country faces up to the challenging energy environment that currently exists. With Texas Genco, NRG can better provide low cost, stable and reliable energy solutions to the regions we serve.”
High Quality Asset Base that Is Well-Positioned Environmentally: Approximately 48% of Texas Genco’s approximately 11,000 MW net generating portfolio consists of three low-cost, efficient solid-fuel baseload plants. Given that generation units are generally dispatched in order of lowest cost and that approximately 73% of the net generation capacity in the ERCOT market is from higher-cost natural gas-fired units, Texas Genco’s baseload units operate nearly 100% of the time they are available. In additional to having excess SO2 allowances, since 1999, Texas Genco has invested over $700 million for NOx emissions controls at its plants, resulting in a fleet that operates at one of the lowest NOx emission rates in the country. The following table provides specifics on Texas Genco’s generating sites:

Approvals and Time to Close
NRG expects to close the transaction during the first quarter of 2006. The transaction is subject to customary closing conditions and regulatory approvals, including approval from the Nuclear Regulatory Commission, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Public Utility Commission of Texas (if required) and antitrust review under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act. No shareholder approval is required.
Advisors
In connection with the transaction, Morgan Stanley is serving as exclusive financial advisor to NRG, and Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom is serving as its legal counsel. Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Lehman Brothers are serving as financial advisors to Texas Genco, and Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP is serving as its legal counsel.
Analyst/Investor Meeting, Conference Call and Webcast
NRG will hold a meeting, conference call and webcast at 10:00 a.m. eastern time on Monday, October 3, 2005 to discuss today’s announcement. Presentation materials can be accessed through the NRG website. The meeting will be held at the Intercontinental Hotel at 111 East 48th Street in New York City. To participate in the call, dial 877.407.8035. International callers should dial 201.689.8035. The call will also be simultaneously webcast at www.nrgenergy.com. A replay of the webcast will be available on www.nrgenergy.com.
About NRG Energy
NRG Energy, Inc. owns and operates a diverse portfolio of more than 15,000 MW of power-generating facilities, primarily located in the Northeast, South Central and Western regions of the United States. Its operations include baseload, intermediate, peaking, and cogeneration facilities, thermal energy production and energy resource recovery facilities. NRG also has ownership interests in generating facilities in Australia and Germany.
About Texas Genco
Texas Genco is one of the largest wholesale electric power generating companies in the United States, providing safe, reliable and competitively priced electricity. The company seeks to lead the nation in operational excellence for independent power producers. Texas Genco owns approximately 11,000 MW of net operating generation capacity. The company sells power and related services in Texas’ largest power market, ERCOT.
Safe Harbor
This press release contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933 and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Such forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks, uncertainties and assumptions that include, but are not limited to, expected earnings and cash flows, future growth and financial performance and the expected synergies and other benefits of the acquisition described herein; and typically can be identified by the use of words such as "will," "expect," "estimate," "anticipate," "forecast," "plan," "believe" and similar terms. Although the Company believes that its expectations are reasonable, it can give no assurance that these expectations will prove to have been correct, and actual results may vary materially. Factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated above include, among others: risks and uncertainties related to the capital markets generally, and the availability of financing for the proposed transaction as well as our operating requirements; general economic conditions, changes in the wholesale power markets and fluctuations in the cost of fuel or other raw materials; the volatility of energy and fuel prices; hazards customary to the power production industry and power generation operations such as fuel and electricity price volatility, unusual weather conditions, catastrophic weather-related or other damage to facilities, unscheduled generation outages, maintenance or repairs, unanticipated changes to fossil fuel supply costs or availability due to higher demand, shortages, transportation problems or other developments, environmental incidents, or electric transmission or gas pipeline system constraints and the possibility that we may not have adequate insurance to cover losses as a result of such hazards; the liquidity and competitiveness of wholesale markets for
energy commodities, changes in government regulation, including possible changes of market rules, market structures and design, rates, tariffs, environmental laws and regulations and regulatory compliance requirements; price mitigation strategies and other market structures or designs employed by independent system operators, or ISOs, or regional transmission organizations, or RTOs, that result in a failure to adequately compensate our generation units for all of their costs; failure to realize expected synergies and other benefits as a result of the acquisition described herein; and our substantial indebtedness and the indebtedness that we will incur in connection with the acquisition.
The Company undertakes no obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. The foregoing review of factors that could cause the Company's actual results to differ materially from those contemplated in the forward-looking statements included in this press release should be considered in connection with information regarding risks and uncertainties that may affect the Company 's future results included in the Company 's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC") at www.sec.gov.
















Quick Links






Explore Blackstone






Get in Touch



























  Back to Top









© 2016 The Blackstone Group L.P. | English | 中文 (Chinese)
Transparency & Disclosure | Legal | Privacy | Cookie Notice | Japan Disclaimer



プライバシー・ポリシー  | 法規制に基づく開示
ブラックストーン・グループ・ジャパン株式会社金融商品取引業者 関東財務局（金商）第１７８５号加入協会/日本証券業協会　一般社団法人第二種金融商品取引業協会





×
Stay up-to-dateEmail AlertsTo receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien's Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.
           
 email address (required)


 first name (required)


 last name (required)

company name
job title

Byron Wien Market Commentary
                

Blackstone Press Releases
                



   Submit
          


Cookie Information and Consent RequestBlackstone Cookie PolicyThis website uses cookies, including third-party cookies, which allow Blackstone to obtain information about your visit to the website. Please click on the link "Learn More" below if you would like more information about the cookies used on this website and how to select certain cookies. You will also be able to refuse the installation of certain cookies. By continuing to use this website (clicking on a picture or link under this banner), you consent to the use of cookies.
Learn More Continue 


×
Contact UsGeneralFor office-specific contact information, please visit our offices page. Switchboard: +1 (212) 583-5000Email Alerts & Investor RelationsTo receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien’s Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.
For investor relations contact information or to receive email notifications for SEC filings, events, end of day stock quotes, and financial reports, please visit our Investor Relations page.
Investor Relations Contact InformationUS: +1 888-756-8443International: +1 646-313-6590BlackstoneInvestorRelations@blackstone.com Media ContactsFor media inquiries or recent press releases, please click here.





 


Texas Genco














































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog











Related Companies

8point3 Energy Partners LP
ALPHA GREEN ENERGY Ltd
Abengoa Yield Ltd
Active Power, Inc.
Aep Generating Co /Oh/
Aep Texas Central Co
Aep Texas North Co
Aes Eastern Energy Lp
Alabama Power
Algonquin Pwr & Util
Allegheny Energy
Allegheny Energy Supply Co Llc
Allegheny Generating Co
Alliance Recovery Corp
American Complex Care Inc



        More Related Companies
      





Home



Sample Contracts



By Company


Texas Genco




Texas Genco





      Loading...
    





Standard IndustryClassification
Electric servicesAddress

12301 Kurland Drive, Houston, TX 77034
Phone
713-795-6000



Sample Contracts



Texas Genco –
Employment Agreement
(July 28th, 2005)
This EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT (the Agreement) is dated as of May 9, 2005 (the Effective Date) by and between Texas Genco LLC (the Company), Texas Genco Operating Services LLC, a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company (the Service Company) and Thaddeus Hill (the Executive).



Texas Genco –
Texas Genco Llc and Texas Genco Financing Corp. And Each of the Guarantors
Party Hereto 6.875% Senior Notes Due 2014
(June 6th, 2005)
INDENTURE dated as of December 14, 2004 among Texas Genco LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (Texas Genco LLC), Texas Genco Financing Corp., a Delaware corporation (Financing Corp. and, together with Texas Genco LLC, the Issuers), the Guarantors (as defined) and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee.



Texas Genco –
Employment Agreement
(June 6th, 2005)
This EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT (the Agreement) is dated as of January 12, 2005 (the Effective Date) by and between Texas Genco LLC (the Company), Texas Genco Operating Services LLC, a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company (the Service Company) and Thomas M. Boehlert (the Executive).



Texas Genco –
Employment Agreement
(June 6th, 2005)
This EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT (the Agreement) is dated as of December 15, 2004 (the Effective Date) by and between Texas Genco LLC (the Company), Texas Genco Operating Services LLC, a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company (the Service Company) and Jack A. Fusco (the Executive).



Texas Genco –
CREDIT AGREEMENT Dated as of December 14, 2004 Among TEXAS GENCO LLC, as
Borrower the Several Lenders From Time to Time Parties Hereto GOLDMAN SACHS
CREDIT PARTNERS L.P., as Administrative Agent, Joint Lead Arranger and Joint
Bookrunner MORGAN STANLEY SENIOR FUNDING INC., as Syndication Agent, Joint Lead
Arranger and Joint Bookrunner DEUTSCHE BANK AG, CAYMAN ISLANDS BRANCH, as Co-
Documentation Agent and Joint Bookrunner CITICORP USA, INC., as Co-
Documentation Agent and Joint Bookrunner and DEUTSCHE BANK SECURITIES INC.,
(June 6th, 2005)
CREDIT AGREEMENT, dated as of December 14, 2004, among TEXAS GENCO LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (the Borrower), the lending institutions from time to time parties hereto (each a Lender and, collectively, the Lenders), GOLDMAN SACHS CREDIT PARTNERS L.P., as Administrative Agent, Joint Lead Arranger and Joint Bookrunner, MORGAN STANLEY SENIOR FUNDING INC., as Syndication Agent, Joint Lead Arranger and Joint Bookrunner, DEUTSCHE BANK AG, CAYMAN ISLANDS BRANCH, as Co-Documentation Agent and Joint Bookrunner, CITICORP USA, INC., as Co-Documentation Agent and Joint Bookrunner, and DEUTSCHE BANK SECURITIES INC., as Joint Lead Arranger for the Special Letter of Credit Facility (such term and each other capitalized term used but not defined in this introductory statement having the meaning provided in Section 1).



Texas Genco –
Employment Agreement
(June 6th, 2005)
This EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT (the Agreement) is dated as of December 15, 2004 (the Effective Date) by and between Texas Genco LLC (the Company), Texas Genco Operating Services LLC, a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company (the Service Company) and W. Thaddeus Miller (the Executive).



Texas Genco –
TRANSACTION AGREEMENT Among CENTERPOINT ENERGY, INC., UTILITY HOLDING, LLC, NN
HOUSTON SUB, INC., TEXAS GENCO HOLDINGS, INC., HPC MERGER SUB, INC. And GC
POWER ACQUISITION LLC
(June 6th, 2005)
TRANSACTION AGREEMENT, dated as of July 21, 2004 (this Agreement), by and among CenterPoint Energy, Inc., a Texas corporation (CenterPoint), Utility Holding, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company and wholly-owned subsidiary of CenterPoint (Utility Holding and, together with CenterPoint, sometimes collectively referred to as Parents and, individually, a Parent), NN Houston Sub, Inc., a Texas corporation and a direct wholly-owned subsidiary of Utility Holding (Merger Sub), Texas Genco Holdings, Inc., a Texas corporation (Genco Holdings), GC Power Acquisition LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (Buyer), and HPC Merger Sub, Inc., a Texas corporation and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Buyer (STP Merger Sub).  Parents, Merger Sub, Genco Holdings, Buyer and STP Merger Sub are hereinafter collectively referred to as the parties and each individually as a party.



Texas Genco –
Employment Agreement
(June 6th, 2005)
This EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT (the Agreement) is dated as of January 3, 2005 (the Effective Date) by and between Texas Genco LLC (the Company), Texas Genco Operating Services LLC, a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company (the Service Company) and Margery M. Harris (the Executive).



Texas Genco –
Blackstone Management Partners IV L.L.C. H&F Administration IV, LLC Kohlberg
Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. TPG GenPar III, L.P. TPG GenPar IV, L.P.
(June 6th, 2005)
This letter serves to confirm the retention by Texas Genco LLC (the Company) of Blackstone Management Partners IV L.L.C. (BMP), H&F Administration IV, LLC (H&F), Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. (KKR) and TPG GenPar III, L.P. and TPG GenPar IV, L.P. (together, TPG) to provide management, consulting and financial services to the Company and its divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates (collectively, Texas Genco), as follows below. BMP, H&F, KKR and TPG are collectively referred to herein as the Sponsor Management Entities or us.













×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.










Holding Company Act Release 27692















Home | Previous Page





























SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
(Release No. 35-27692; 70-10128) 
CenterPoint Energy, Inc., et al.
Order Authorizing Various Financing Transactions and Reservations of Jurisdiction
June 30, 2003
CenterPoint Energy, Inc. ("CenterPoint"), a registered holding company and its three public-utility subsidiary companies Texas Genco, LP, ("Texas Genco"), CenterPoint Energy Houston Electric, LLC ("T&D Utility") and CenterPoint Energy Resources Corp. ("GasCo"), CenterPoint's intermediate holding companies, Utility Holding, LLC, Wilmington, DE, Texas Genco Holdings, Inc., Texas Genco GP, LLC and CenterPoint's nonutility subsidiary companies: CenterPoint Energy Funding Company, CenterPoint Energy Transition Bond Company, LLC, Houston Industries FinanceCo GP, LLC, Houston Industries FinanceCo LP, Reliant Energy FinanceCo II GP, LLC, Reliant Energy FinanceCo II LP, Reliant Energy FinanceCo III GP, LLC, Reliant Energy FinanceCo III LP, Reliant Energy FinanceCo IV GP, LLC, Reliant Energy FinanceCo IV LP, CenterPoint Energy Investment Management, Inc., CenterPoint Energy Management Services, Inc., CenterPoint Energy District Cooling, LLC, CenterPoint Energy Thermal Systems (Delaware), Inc., CenterPoint Energy District Cooling, L.P., CenterPoint Energy Power Systems, Inc., CenterPoint Energy Products, Inc., CenterPoint Energy Properties, Inc., CenterPoint Energy Tegco, Inc., HL&P Capital Trust I, HL&P Capital Trust II, HL&P Receivables, Inc., Houston Industries Energy (UK), Inc., NorAm Energy Corp., REI Trust, Reliant Energy Water, Inc., Texas Genco LP, LLC, Utility Rail Services, Inc., UFI Services, Inc., ALG Gas Supply Company, Allied Materials Corporation, Arkansas Louisiana Finance Corporation, Arkla Industries Inc., Arkla Products Company, Blue Jay Gas Company, CenterPoint Energy Alternative Fuels, Inc., CenterPoint Energy Consumer Group, Inc., CenterPoint Energy Field Services, Inc., CenterPoint Energy Field Services Holdings, Inc., CenterPoint Energy Gas Processing, Inc., CenterPoint Energy Gas Marketing Company, CenterPoint Energy Gas Receivables, LLC, CenterPoint Energy Gas Resources Corp., CenterPoint Energy Gas Transmission Company, CenterPoint Energy Hub Services, Inc., CenterPoint Energy - Illinois Gas Transmission Company, CenterPoint Energy Intrastate Holdings, LLC, Pine Pipeline Acquisition Company, LLC, CenterPoint Energy Marketing, Inc., CenterPoint Energy Retail Interests, Inc., CenterPoint Energy - Mississippi River Transmission Corporation, CenterPoint Energy MRT Holdings, Inc., CenterPoint Energy MRT Services Company, CenterPoint Energy Pipeline Services, Inc., CenterPoint Energy OQ, LLC, OQ Partners, a general partnership, CenterPoint Energy Trading and Transportation Group, Inc., Entex Gas Marketing Company, Entex NGV, Inc., Entex Oil & Gas Company, Industrial Gas Supply Corporation, Intex, Inc., Louisiana Unit Gas Transmission Company, Minnesota Intrastate Pipeline Company, National Furnace Company, NorAm Financing, NorAm Utility Services, Inc., Reliant Energy Funds Management, Inc., Unit Gas Transmission Company, United Gas, Inc., CenterPoint Energy International, Inc., CenterPoint Energy International Holdings, LLC, Reliant Energy El Salvador, S.A. de C.V., CenterPoint Energy International II, Inc., HIE Ford Heights, Inc., HIE Fulton, Inc., Reliant Energy India, Inc., Reliant Energy Rain, Inc., Rain Calcining Limited, CenterPoint Energy International Services, Inc., CenterPoint Energy Light, Inc., HI Energy Holdings I B.V., Reliant Energy Brasil, Ltda., Reliant Energy Brazil Ltd., HIE Brasil Rio Sul Ltda., Reliant Energy International Brasil Ltda., Reliant Energy Brazil Tiete Ltd., Reliant Energy Colombia Ltda., Reliant Energy Outsource Ltd., Venus Generation El Salvador, Worldwide Electric Holdings B.V., c/o CenterPoint Energy, Inc., Houston, TX (together, "Applicants"), have filed an amended and restated application-declaration under sections 6(a), 7, 9(a), 10, 12(b), (c), (d) and 13(b) and rules 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 53, 54, 90 and 91 of the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935, as amended ("Act"), ("Application").1  The Securities and Exchange Commission ("Commission") issued a notice of the Application on June 2, 2003.2  No request for a hearing was received. 
Applicants request authority to engage in a variety of financing transactions, credit support arrangements, and other related proposals, as more fully described below, commencing on the effective date of an order issued under this filing and ending June 30, 2005 ("Authorization Period"). 
I. Background 
By order dated July 5, 2002 (the "July Order"),3 the Commission authorized the formation of CenterPoint as a new registered holding company and the distribution ("Distribution") to shareholders of the remaining stock of Reliant Resources, Inc. ("Reliant Resources").  The Distribution, which was made on September 30, 2002, completed the separation from CenterPoint of the merchant power generation and energy trading and marketing business of Reliant Resources.  
While the Distribution was necessary and appropriate both from a business perspective and in view of the policies and provisions of the Act, it did have the effect of significantly reducing CenterPoint's common equity in the short term.  As the Commission has noted, however, CenterPoint's capital structure is expected to improve significantly with the sale of Texas Genco and the securitization of any stranded investment in 2004 and 2005, as contemplated by Texas law.  Pending the issuance of securitization bonds, the CenterPoint system's financing transactions will be largely limited to refinancing, replacing or extending the term of existing obligations.  
II. Financing Parameters
Financing by each Applicant will be subject to the following limitations ("Financing Parameters").
A. Interest Rates
The effective cost of money on any long-term debt financings will not exceed the greater of (i) 700 basis points over the yield to maturity of a U.S. Treasury security having a remaining term approximately equal to the term of the subject debt, or (ii) a rate that is consistent with similar securities of comparable credit quality and maturities issued by other companies of reasonably comparable credit quality, as determined by competitive capital markets. 
The effective cost of money on any short-term debt financings will not exceed the greater of (i) 700 basis points over the comparable-term London Interbank Offered Rate ("LIBOR") rates, or (ii) a rate that is consistent with similar securities of comparable credit quality and maturities issued by other companies of reasonably comparable credit quality as determined by the competitive capital markets.
The dividend rate on any series of preferred stock or preferred or equity-linked securities will not exceed the greater of (i) 700 basis points over the yield to maturity of a U.S. Treasury security having a remaining term approximately equal to the term of the series of preferred stock or preferred or equity-linked securities or (ii) a rate that is consistent with similar securities of comparable credit quality and maturities issued by other companies, of reasonably comparable credit quality, as determined by competitive capital markets. 
B. Maturity
The maturity of long-term debt will not exceed 50 years.  All series of preferred stock, preferred securities and equity-linked securities (other than perpetual preferred stock) will be redeemed no later than 50 years after the issuance thereof. 
C. Issuance Expenses
The underwriting fees, commissions or other similar remuneration paid in connection with the non-competitive issue, sale or distribution of a security will not exceed 7% of the principal or total amount of the securities being issued;4
D. Use of Proceeds
The proceeds from the sale of securities in external financing transactions will be used for general corporate purposes, including: (i) the financing, in part, of the capital expenditures of the CenterPoint system; (ii) the financing of working capital requirements of the CenterPoint system; (iii) the refinancing or acquisition, retirement or redemption under rule 42 of securities previously issued by CenterPoint or its Subsidiaries or as otherwise authorized by the Commission; (iv) direct or indirect investment in companies authorized under the Act; (v) to meet unexpected contingencies, payment and timing differences, and cash requirements, and (vi) other lawful purposes.  
E. Common Equity Ratio
At all times during the Authorization Period, each Utility Subsidiary will maintain common equity of at least 30% of its consolidated capitalization (common equity, preferred stock, long-term and short-term debt) as reflected in the most recent 10-K or 10-Q filed with the Commission adjusted to reflect changes in capitalization since the balance sheet date therein.5 
F. Investment Grade Ratings
Apart from securities issued for the purpose of funding money pool operations, no guarantees or other securities (other than common stock) may be issued in reliance on the authority requested herein unless: (i) the security to be issued, if rated, is rated investment grade by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization as that term is used in paragraphs (c)(2)(vi)(E), (F) and (H) of Rule 15c3-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 ("NRSRO"); (ii) all outstanding rated securities of the issuer are rated investment grade by at least one NRSRO; and (iii) all outstanding rated securities of the top-level registered holding company are rated investment grade by at least one NRSRO (collectively, "Investment Grade Ratings Criteria").  The Applicants ask the Commission to reserve jurisdiction over the issuance of securities subject to the Investment Grade Ratings Criteria where one or more of the Investment Grade Ratings Criteria are not met.  
III. Proposed Financing Program
A.  CenterPoint External Financing
CenterPoint requests authority to issue and sell securities, including common stock, preferred stock and preferred and equity-linked securities (either directly or through a subsidiary), long-term and short-term debt securities and convertible securities and derivative instruments with respect to any of these securities.6  CenterPoint also requests authorization to enter into obligations with respect to tax-exempt debt issued on behalf of CenterPoint by governmental authorities.  These obligations may relate to the refunding of outstanding tax-exempt debt or to the remarketing of tax-exempt debt.  CenterPoint seeks authorization to enter into lease arrangements, and certain hedging transactions in connection with issuances of taxable or tax-exempt securities.  
CenterPoint requests authority to sell securities covered by this Application in any one of the following ways: (i) through underwriters; (ii) to initial purchasers in transactions in reliance on Rule 144A under the Securities Act of 1933 or dealers; (iii) through agents; (iv) directly to a limited number of purchasers or a single purchaser; (v) in exchange for already outstanding securities; or (vi) directly to employees (or to trusts established for their benefit), shareholders and others.  If underwriters are used in the sale of the securities, such securities may be acquired by the underwriters for their own account and may be resold from time to time in one or more transactions, including negotiated transactions, at a fixed public offering price or at varying prices determined at the time of sale. The securities may be offered to the public either through underwriting syndicates (which may be represented by a managing underwriter or underwriters designated by CenterPoint) or directly by one or more underwriters acting alone.  The securities may be sold directly by CenterPoint or through agents designated by CenterPoint from time to time.  If common stock is being sold in an underwritten offering, CenterPoint may grant the underwriters a "green shoe" option permitting the purchase from CenterPoint at the same price of additional shares then being offered solely for the purpose of covering over-allotments.
1. Common Stock
CenterPoint requests authority to issue 200 million additional shares of common stock (including "Rights")7 and to issue warrants, options and other rights to acquire an equivalent number of shares of common stock.  In addition, CenterPoint proposes, from time to time during the Authorization Period, to issue and/or acquire in open market transactions or negotiated block purchases, shares of CenterPoint common stock for allocation under incentive compensation plans and other equity compensation and employee benefit plans, and for the Investor's Choice Plan.8   These transactions would comply with applicable law and Commission interpretations then in effect.  Any newly issued shares of common stock, including shares of common stock issued upon the conversion or exercise of warrants, convertible debt or other equity-linked securities, will be counted toward the overall limit on common stock; shares of common stock purchased in the open market or otherwise acquired for the purpose of reissuance under Stock Based Plans will also be counted toward this limit.
2. Preferred Stock and Preferred and Equity-Linked Securities
CenterPoint requests Commission authority during the Authorization Period to issue preferred stock and to issue directly or indirectly through one or more financing subsidiaries ("Financing Subsidiaries") preferred stock, preferred securities (including trust preferred securities), and equity-linked securities (including, specifically, preferred securities that are convertible, either mandatorily or at the option of the holder, into common stock or forward purchase contracts for common stock).  Equity-linked securities will be linked to common stock or preferred stock or preferred securities that CenterPoint is otherwise authorized to issue.
CenterPoint requests authority to issue or sell preferred stock and preferred securities (including trust preferred securities) and equity-linked securities in an incremental amount of $250 million such that the total outstanding amount of CenterPoint preferred stock and preferred and equity-linked securities will not exceed $975 million at any one time outstanding during the Authorization Period.
Preferred stock and equity-linked securities may be sold directly or indirectly to or through underwriters, initial purchasers or dealers or pursuant to a method of distribution similar to those described for common stock above.
3. Long-Term Debt 
CenterPoint requests authority to issue or sell external long-term debt securities in an incremental amount of $500 million and external short-term debt securities in an incremental amount of $500 million, subject to an overall incremental limit of $500 million in long-term and short-term debt securities (the "CenterPoint Additional Debt Limit") such that the total amount of CenterPoint debt securities will not exceed $5.847 billion at any one time outstanding during the Authorization Period (the "CenterPoint Aggregate Debt Limit").  CenterPoint requests that the Commission reserve jurisdiction over $478 million of the CenterPoint Additional Debt Limit such that the amount of CenterPoint external debt securities under the authorized CenterPoint Aggregate Debt Limit will not exceed $5.369 billion at any one time outstanding during the Authorization Period.  
Long-term debt securities may be comprised of bonds, notes, medium-term notes or debentures under one or more indentures or long-term indebtedness under agreements with banks or other institutional lenders directly or indirectly and convertible debt.  Long-term securities could also include obligations relating to the refunding or remarketing of tax-exempt debt issued on behalf of CenterPoint or its Subsidiaries by governmental authorities.  Long-term debt issued under the requested authority will be unsecured.  Specific terms of any borrowings will be determined by CenterPoint at the time of issuance and will comply in all regards with the parameters on financing authorization set forth above.  
4. Short-Term Debt
CenterPoint seeks authority to issue short-term debt subject to the CenterPoint Additional Debt Limit to provide financing for general corporate purposes, working capital requirements and temporary financing of Subsidiary capital expenditures.  Short-term debt issued by CenterPoint will be unsecured.
Types of short-term debt securities may include borrowings under one or more revolving credit facilities or bank loans, commercial paper, short-term notes, bid notes, institutional borrowings and privately placed notes.  Specific terms of any short-term borrowings will be determined by CenterPoint at the time of issuance and will comply in all regards with the parameters for financing authorization set forth above.  The maturity of any short-term debt issued will not exceed 364 days or, if the notional maturity is greater than 364 days, the debt security will include put options at appropriate points in time to cause the security to be accounted for as a current liability under generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP").
CenterPoint may sell commercial paper or privately placed notes ("commercial paper") from time to time, in established domestic or European commercial paper markets.  Commercial paper may be sold at a discount or bear interest at a rate per annum prevailing at the date of issuance for commercial paper of a similarly situated company.
CenterPoint may, without counting against the limit on parent financing set forth above, maintain back-up lines of credit in connection with one or more commercial paper programs in an aggregate amount not to exceed the amount of authorized commercial paper.
CenterPoint may sell short-term notes through one or more private placements or public offerings primarily to traditional money market investors.  CenterPoint may enter into individual agreements with one or more commercial banks that may or may not be lenders under CenterPoint credit facilities.  These agreements would permit CenterPoint to negotiate with one or more banks on any given day for such lender, or any affiliate or subsidiary of such lender, to purchase promissory notes directly from CenterPoint.
5. Financing Risk Management Devices
CenterPoint requests authority to enter into hedging arrangements intended to reduce or manage the volatility of financial or other business risks to which CenterPoint is subject.  These arrangements may include, but are not limited to, interest rate swaps, caps, floors, collars, forward agreements, issuance of structured notes (i.e., a debt instrument in which the principal and/or interest payments are indirectly linked to the value of an underlying asset or index), or transactions involving the purchase or sale, including short sales, of U.S. Treasury or U.S. governmental agency (e.g. Fannie Mae) obligations or LIBOR based swap instruments (collectively referred to as "Hedging Instruments").  The transactions would be for fixed periods and stated notional amounts, as are generally accepted as prudent in the capital markets.  In no case will the notional principal amount of any interest rate hedge exceed that of the underlying debt instrument.  CenterPoint will not engage in speculative transactions as that term is described in Statement of Financial Accounting Standards 133, as amended ("SFAS 133").  Transaction fees, commissions and other amounts payable to brokers in connection with an interest rate hedge will not exceed those generally obtainable in competitive markets for parties of comparable credit quality.
CenterPoint may employ interest rate derivatives as a means of prudently managing the risk associated with any of its outstanding debt issued under this authorization or an applicable exemption by, in effect, synthetically (i) converting variable rate debt to fixed-rate debt; (ii) converting fixed-rate debt to variable rate debt; (iii) limiting the impact of changes in interest rates resulting from variable rate debt; and (iv) managing other risks that may attend outstanding securities.  Transactions will be entered into for a fixed or determinable period.  CenterPoint will only enter into agreements with counterparties having a senior debt rating at the time the transaction is executed of at least BBB-, or its equivalent, as published by a NRSRO ("Approved Counterparties").
In addition, CenterPoint requests authorization to enter into hedging transactions with respect to anticipated debt offerings ("Anticipatory Hedges"), subject to the limitations and restrictions expressed below.  Anticipatory Hedges would only be entered into with Approved Counterparties, and would be used to fix and/or limit the risk associated with any issuance of securities through appropriate means, including (i) a forward sale of exchange-traded Hedging Instruments (a "Forward Sale"); (ii) the purchase of put options on Hedging Instruments (a "Put Options Purchase"); (iii) a Put Options Purchase in combination with the sale of call options Hedge Instruments (a "Zero Cost Collar"); (iv) some combination of a Forward Sale, Put Options Purchase, Zero Cost Collar and/or other derivative or cash transactions, including, but not limited to structured notes, caps and collars, appropriate for the Anticipatory Hedges; and (v) other financial derivatives or other products including Treasury rate locks, swaps, forward starting swaps, and options on the foregoing.  Anticipatory Hedges may be executed on-exchange ("On-Exchange Trades") with brokers through the opening of futures and/or options positions traded on the Chicago Board of Trade ("CBOT"), the opening of over-the-counter positions with one or more counterparties ("Off-Exchange Trades"), or a combination of On-Exchange Trades and Off-Exchange Trades.  CenterPoint or its applicable Subsidiary will determine the structure of each Anticipatory Hedge transaction at the time of execution.  CenterPoint or a Subsidiary may decide to lock in interest rates and/or limit its exposure to interest rate increases.
Each Hedging Instrument and Anticipatory Hedge will be treated for accounting purposes as provided for under GAAP.  CenterPoint and its Subsidiaries will comply with SFAS 133 and SFAS 138 ("Accounting for Certain Derivative Instruments and Certain Hedging Activities") or other standards relating to accounting for derivative transactions as are adopted and implemented by the Financial Accounting Standards Board. 
B. Subsidiary Financing 
To the extent not otherwise exempted,9 the Utility Subsidiaries and the Intermediate Holding Companies request authority to issue and sell securities, including preferred stock and preferred securities (including trust preferred securities) (either directly or through a subsidiary), long-term and short-term debt securities, including convertible debt and derivative instruments with respect to any of the foregoing on the same terms and conditions as discussed above for CenterPoint, except that Utility Subsidiary and Intermediate Holding Company debt may be secured or unsecured.10 
Texas Genco Holdings, Inc. and Texas Genco (together, the "Texas Genco Entities") request authority to issue or sell external long-term debt securities in an aggregate principal amount of $250 million and external short-term debt securities in an aggregate principal amount of $250 million, subject to an overall aggregate principal amount of $250 million in long-term and short-term external debt securities at any one time outstanding during the Authorization Period.
The T&D Utility requests authority to issue and sell external long-term debt securities in an incremental amount of $500 million and external short-term debt securities in an incremental amount of $500 million, subject to an overall incremental limit of $500 million in long-term and short-term debt securities (the "T&D Utility Additional Debt Limit"), such that the amount of T&D Utility external debt will not exceed $3.603 billion at any one time outstanding during the Authorization Period (the "T&D Utility Aggregate Debt Limit").  The T&D Utility requests that 
the Commission reserve jurisdiction over $250 million of the T&D Utility Additional Debt Limit such that the amount of T&D Utility external debt securities under the authorized T&D Utility Aggregate Debt Limit will not exceed $3.353 billion at any one time outstanding during the Authorization Period.
In addition, the T&D Utility requests authority to issue or sell preferred stock and preferred securities (including trust preferred securities) in an amount not to exceed $250 million at any one time outstanding during the Authorization Period.
GasCo requests authority to issue or sell external long-term debt securities in an incremental amount of $500 million and external short-term debt securities in an incremental amount of $500 million, subject to an overall incremental limit of $500 million in long-term and short-term debt securities (the "GasCo Additional Debt Limit") such that the amount of external GasCo debt will not exceed $3.037 billion at any one time outstanding during the Authorization Period (the "GasCo Aggregate Debt Limit").  GasCo requests that the Commission reserve jurisdiction over the issuance of GasCo external debt securities in the amount of $500 million, the GasCo Additional Debt Limit, such that the amount of GasCo external debt securities under the authorized GasCo Aggregate Debt Limit will not exceed $2.537 billion at any one time outstanding during the Authorization Period.
In addition, GasCo requests authority to issue or sell preferred stock and preferred securities (including trust preferred securities) in an amount not to exceed $250 million such that the amount of preferred stock and preferred securities (including trust preferred securities) will not exceed $250.4 million at any one time outstanding during the Authorization Period.
The Utility Subsidiaries and Intermediate Holding Companies also request authorization to enter into obligations with respect to new tax-exempt debt issued on behalf of a Utility 
Subsidiary or an Intermediate Holding Company by governmental authorities as well as obligations entered into in connection with the refunding of outstanding tax-exempt debt assumed by CenterPoint in connection with the August 31, 2002 restructuring by which CenterPoint and Utility Holding, LLC became holding companies for the Utility Subsidiaries.  The Intermediate Holding Companies, other than Texas Genco Holdings, Inc., will not issue or sell securities to entities outside of the CenterPoint system.  The Utility Subsidiaries also request authority to enter into hedging transactions to manage their risk in connection with the issuance of securities subject to the limitations and requirements applicable to CenterPoint, provided, that the Intermediate Holding Companies will not enter into such hedging transactions.
C. Guarantees and Intra-System Advances
1. Guarantees
CenterPoint requests authorization during the Authorization Period to enter into guarantees to third parties, obtain letters of credit, enter into support or expense agreements or liquidity support agreements or otherwise provide credit support with respect to the obligations of its Subsidiaries, including performance guarantees, as may be appropriate to carry on in the ordinary course of CenterPoint or its Subsidiaries' duly-authorized utility and related businesses, and the Subsidiaries request authority to provide to their respective Subsidiaries guarantees and other forms of credit support in an aggregate amount not to exceed $4 billion outstanding at any one time ("CenterPoint Guarantee Limit").  Excluded from the CenterPoint Guarantee Limit are obligations exempt under rule 45 under the Act.  Any guarantees shall also be subject to the limitations of rules 53 and 58, as applicable.
The guarantor may charge each Subsidiary a fee for any guarantee provided on its behalf that is not greater than the cost, if any, of obtaining the liquidity necessary to perform the guarantee (for example, bank line commitment fees or letter of credit fees, plus other transactional expenses) for the period of time the guarantee remains outstanding.
Certain of the guarantees referred to above may be in support of obligations that are not capable of exact quantification.  In these cases, CenterPoint will determine the exposure under the guarantee by appropriate means, including estimation of exposure based on loss experience or projected potential payment amounts.  As appropriate, these estimates will be made in accordance with GAAP and sound financial practices.  Such estimation will be re-evaluated periodically.
2. Money Pool
CenterPoint and certain of its Subsidiaries (together, the "Parties") request authorization to continue to conduct the Money Pool as approved in the July Order, and the Subsidiaries, to the extent not exempted by rule 52 under the Act, also request authorization to make, from time to time, unsecured short-term borrowings from the Money Pool and to contribute surplus funds to the Money Pool and to lend and extend credit to (and acquire promissory notes from) one another through the Money Pool.11 
CenterPoint requests authorization to contribute surplus funds and to lend and extend credit to the Utility Subsidiaries through the Money Pool.  CenterPoint will not be a borrower from the Money Pool.
Under the terms of the Money Pool, each Party determines each day the amount of funds each desires to contribute to the Money Pool, and contributes such funds to the Money Pool.  The determination of whether a Party has funds to contribute (either from surplus funds or from external borrowings) and the determination whether a Party shall lend such funds to the Money Pool is made by such Party's treasurer, or by a designee thereof, in such Party's sole discretion.  Each Party may withdraw any of its funds at any time upon notice to CenterPoint as administrative agent of the Money Pool.  
Short-term funds will be available from the following sources: (1) surplus funds in the treasuries of the Parties; and (2) proceeds from external borrowings, including bank loans, the sale of notes and/or the sale of commercial paper by the Parties, in each case to the extent permitted by applicable laws and regulatory orders.  
Each borrowing Party will borrow pro rata from each fund source in the same proportion that the amount of funds provided from that fund source bears to the total amount then loaned through the Money Pool.  On a day when more than one source of funds is invested in the Money Pool with different rates of interest used to fund loans through the Money Pool, each borrower will borrow pro rata from each such funding source from the Money Pool in the same proportion that the amount of funds provided by that fund source bears to the total amount of funds invested into the Money Pool.  If there are insufficient funds to meet all borrowing requests, the needs of the Utility Subsidiaries will be met before loans are made to any Nonutility Subsidiaries.
The determination of whether a Party has funds to lend to the Money Pool will be made by its Treasurer, or by a designee thereof.  CenterPoint, as administrator of the Money Pool, will provide each Party with a report for each business day that includes, among other things, cash activity for the day and the balance of loans outstanding.  All borrowings from the Money Pool shall be authorized by the borrowing Party's treasurer, or by a designee thereof.  No Party shall be required to effect a borrowing through the Money Pool if such Party determines that it can (and is authorized to) effect such borrowing more advantageously directly from banks or through the sale of its own notes or commercial paper. 
Funds which are loaned by Parties and are not utilized to satisfy borrowing needs of other Parties will be invested by CenterPoint on behalf of the lending Parties in one or more short term instruments, including (i) interest-bearing deposits with banks; (ii) obligations issued or guaranteed by the U.S. government and/or its agencies; (iii) commercial paper rated not less than A-1 by Standard & Poor's and P-1 by Moody's Investors Services, Inc.; (iv) money market funds; (v) bank certificates of deposit; (vi) Eurodollar funds; (vii) repurchase agreements collateralized by securities issued or guaranteed by the U.S. government; and (viii) such other investments as are permitted by section 9(c) of the Act and rule 40.
The interest rate applicable on any day to then outstanding loans through the Money Pool, whether or not evidenced by a promissory demand note, will be the composite weighted average daily effective cost incurred by CenterPoint for external borrowings outstanding on that date.  The daily effective cost shall be inclusive of interest rate swaps related to such external funds.  If there are no external borrowings outstanding on that date, then the rate will be the certificate of deposit yield equivalent of the 30-day Federal Reserve "AA" Non-Financial Commercial Paper Composite Rate or if no composite is established for that day, then the applicable rate will be the composite for the next preceding day for which a composite is established.  If the composite shall cease to exist, then the rate will be the composite which then most closely resembles the composite and/or most closely mirrors the pricing CenterPoint would expect if it had external borrowings.
Interest income related to external investments will be calculated daily and allocated back to lending Parties on the basis of their relative contribution to the Money Pool on that date.
Each Party receiving a loan from the Money Pool shall repay the principal amount of such loan, together with all interest accrued, on demand by the administrator and in any event not later than the expiration date of the Commission authorization for the operation of the Money Pool.  All loans made through the Money Pool may be prepaid by the borrower without premium or penalty.
Borrowings by the Utility Subsidiaries from the Money Pool shall not exceed the following amounts at any one time outstanding during the Authorization Period: Texas Genco - $600 million; T&D Utility - $600 million; GasCo - $600 million. 
3. Other Intra-System Financing
The Subsidiaries may also finance their capital needs through borrowings from CenterPoint, directly or indirectly through one or more Intermediate Holding Companies.   Any financings by Utility Subsidiaries pursuant to this request would be counted toward the Money Pool limits above.
Each of the Intermediate Holding Companies requests authority to issue and sell securities to its respective parent companies and to acquire securities from its subsidiary companies on the same terms and conditions as specified above.
D. Changes in Capital Stock of Majority Owned Nonutility Subsidiaries
Applicants request authority to change the terms of any 50% or more owned Nonutility Subsidiary's authorized capital stock capitalization or other equity interests by an amount deemed appropriate by CenterPoint or other intermediate parent company, provided that no such action would be taken without the consents necessary under applicable law.  
E. Payment of Dividends Out of Capital or Unearned Surplus
Each of the Nonutility Subsidiaries requests authority to declare and pay dividends out of capital or unearned surplus to the extent permitted by state law.  
CenterPoint also requests authority to declare and pay dividends out of capital or unearned surplus in an amount up to $500 million through the Authorization Period.  CenterPoint requests the Commission to reserve jurisdiction over this request.  Such authority is requested because of the accounting consequences of the Distribution.  As of December 31, 2002, CenterPoint had negative retained earnings of approximately $1.1 billion.  It is CenterPoint's intention, however, to declare and pay dividends out of current earnings.  
F. Financing Subsidiaries
CenterPoint and its Subsidiaries proposes to organize and acquire, directly or indirectly, the common stock or other equity interests of one or more financing subsidiaries (collectively, the "Financing Subsidiary") for the purpose of effecting various financing transactions from time to time through the Authorization Period.12   Financing Subsidiaries may be corporations, trusts, partnerships or other entities created specifically for the purposes described in this Application.  The amount of securities issued by the Financing Subsidiaries to third parties will count toward the respective financing limits of its immediate parent.  Authorization is requested for the issuance of such securities by the Financing Subsidiaries and for the transfer of proceeds from such issuance to the respective parent companies.  
CenterPoint and, to the extent such issuances are not exempt under rule 52, the Subsidiaries also request authorization to issue their subordinated unsecured notes ("Subordinated Notes") to any Financing Subsidiary to evidence the loan of financing proceeds by a Financing Subsidiary to its parent company.  The principal amount, maturity and interest rate on such Subordinated Notes will be designed to parallel the amount, maturity and interest or distribution rate on the securities issued by a Financing Subsidiary, in respect of which the Subordinated Note is issued.  CenterPoint or a Subsidiary may, if required, guarantee or enter into support or expense agreements in respect of the obligations of such Financing Subsidiaries.    
Applicants anticipate that the Financing Subsidiaries will be wholly-owned indirect subsidiaries of CenterPoint and fully consolidated for purposes of financial reporting.  No Financing Subsidiary shall acquire or dispose of, directly or indirectly, any interest in any utility asset, as that term is defined under the Act, without first obtaining any necessary approval.
The business of the Financing Subsidiary will be limited to effecting financing transactions that have been otherwise authorized for CenterPoint and its Subsidiaries.  In connection with these transactions, CenterPoint or the Subsidiaries may enter into one or more guarantees or other credit support agreements in favor of the Financing Subsidiary.  
Any Financing Subsidiary shall be organized only if, in management's opinion, the creation and utilization of the Financing Subsidiary will likely result in tax savings, increased access to capital markets and/or lower cost of capital for CenterPoint or its Subsidiaries.
Each of CenterPoint and the Subsidiaries also requests authorization to enter into an expense agreement with its respective Financing Subsidiary, under which it would agree to pay all expenses of the entity.  Any amounts issued by the Financing Subsidiaries to third parties will be included in the additional external financing limitation for the immediate parent of the financing entity.  However, the underlying intra-system mirror debt and parent guarantee will not be included.  Applicants also seek authority for the Financing Subsidiaries to transfer the proceeds of any financing to their respective parent companies.
IV. Retention and Reorganization of Nonutility Interests
A. Retention of Nonutility Interests
In the July Order, the Commission reserved jurisdiction over the retention of CenterPoint Energy Investment Management, Inc., MRT Services Company and CenterPoint Energy Trading and Transportation Group, Inc.  
Applicants request that the Commission authorize the retention of CenterPoint Energy Investment Management, Inc., a Delaware corporation, and a wholly-owned subsidiary of CenterPoint.  CenterPoint Energy Investment Management, Inc. holds shares of stock of AOL Time Warner that were received in connection with the 1995 sale of certain cable television businesses.  To avoid the risks inherent in holding a volatile stock such as Time Warner and to capture the value of its appreciation, in 1999 the stock was monetized by the issuance of Zero-Premium Exchangeable Subordinated Notes, or ZENS.  The notes, which mature in 2029, bear interest at 2% per annum plus the amount of any cash dividends paid on the related Time Warner shares and are redeemable at a price tied to the price of Time Warner (now AOL Time Warner) common stock.  CenterPoint still holds title to the underlying AOL Time Warner common stock, which serves as a hedge against changes in the value of the ZENS, through CenterPoint Energy Investment Management, Inc.  Changes in the fair value of the AOL Time Warner common stock held by CenterPoint are expected to substantially offset changes in the fair value of the derivative component of the ZENS.   
Applicants assert that CenterPoint Energy Investment Management, Inc. is a retainable finance subsidiary consistent with Commission precedent.13  Applicants state that the sole purpose of CenterPoint Energy Investment Management, Inc. is to own securities acquired long before CenterPoint became a registered holding company, where the sole purpose of such ownership is to provide as a hedge against CenterPoint's obligations under the ZENS.
MRT Services Company's sole purpose is the ownership of a canal that had been acquired in connection with Reliant Resources' California generation projects.  CenterPoint asks the Commission to grant it three years to divest the canal.  The divestiture is appropriate to effectuate the provisions of section 11(b) of the Act.  CenterPoint further requests that the Commission issue a supplemental order making the necessary findings to enable CenterPoint to obtain the tax treatment provided by section 1081 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, in connection with the ordered disposition.  CenterPoint requests the Commission to reserve jurisdiction over the request for a supplemental order, pending completion of the record.
CenterPoint Energy Trading and Transportation Group, Inc. provides administrative payroll services to associated pipeline companies at cost determined in accordance with rules 90 and 91.   CenterPoint agrees to transfer the personnel and functions of this company to the CenterPoint system subsidiary service company, upon its formation.14
B.  Authority to Restructure Nonutility Interests
CenterPoint proposes to restructure its nonutility interests from time to time as may be necessary or appropriate.  CenterPoint will engage, directly or indirectly, only in businesses that are duly authorized, whether by order, rule or statute.  
V. Disposition of the Texas Genco Entities
CenterPoint intends to qualify Texas Genco as an EWG as expeditiously as possible.  In the event that EWG status is not obtained in a timely fashion, CenterPoint seeks authority pursuant to section 12(d) of the Act to sell the stock and/or assets of the Texas Genco Entities to Reliant Resources.  CenterPoint asks the Commission to reserve jurisdiction over this request pending completion of the record.
VI. Securitization of Stranded Costs
The Texas electric restructuring law provides for the use of special purpose entities to issue securitization bonds for the economic value of generation-related regulatory assets and stranded costs.  These bonds would be amortized through non-bypassable charges to the T&D Utility's customers that are authorized by the Texas Commission.  Any stranded costs not recovered through the securitization bonds would be recovered through a non-bypassable charge assessed to customers taking delivery service from the T&D Utility.
CenterPoint seeks authority to form and capitalize one or more special-purpose subsidiaries of the T&D Utility to issue in an amount not to exceed that authorized by the Texas Commission, in securitization bonds in 2004 or 2005 to monetize and recover the balance of stranded costs relating to previously owned electric generation assets and other qualified costs as determined in a 2004 true-up proceeding, and, as may be required, for such subsidiaries to transfer the proceeds to the T&D Utility, Utility Holding, LLC and CenterPoint.  The issuance will be done pursuant to a financing order issued by the Texas Commission.  As with the debt of its existing transition bond company, the holders of the securitization bonds would not have recourse to any assets or revenues of CenterPoint or its subsidiary companies (other than those of the special purpose transition bond company), nor would the system's creditors have recourse to any assets or revenues of the entity issuing the securitization bonds (again other than those of the special purpose transition bond company).  All or a portion of the proceeds from the issuance of bonds will be used to repay debt of CenterPoint and its subsidiary companies.   Any issuance would be subject to the financing parameters described above.  CenterPoint requests that the Commission reserve jurisdiction over this request, pending completion of the record.
VII. Other Authority
In the July Order, the Commission authorized CenterPoint to provide a variety of services to its Subsidiaries in areas such as accounting, rates and regulation, internal auditing, strategic planning, external relations, legal services, risk management, marketing, financial services and information systems and technology.  CenterPoint states that it intends to form a service company and is in the process of preparing the request for authorization.   In the interim, CenterPoint seeks continuing authority to provide jurisdictional services and goods to its Subsidiaries through December 31, 2003.  CenterPoint states that charges for all services will be on an at-cost basis, as determined under rules 90 and 91 of the Act.
VIII.  Conclusion
Applicants state, for purposes of rule 54, that the conditions specified in rule 53(a) are satisfied, with the exception of 53(a)(1),15 and that none of the adverse conditions specified in rule 53(b) exist.  As a result, the Commission has considered the effect on the CenterPoint system of the capitalization or earnings of any CenterPoint subsidiary that is an EWG or FUCO, as each is defined in sections 32 and 33 of the Act, respectively, in determining whether to approve the proposed transactions.  Further, CenterPoint states that it is attempting to dispose of its remaining interests in EWGs and FUCOs.  CenterPoint represents that it will remain in compliance with the requirements of rule 53(a), other than rule 53(a)(1), at all times during the Authorization Period.
Applicants state that no federal or state commission other than this Commission has jurisdiction over the proposed transactions.  Applicants state that fees and expenses to be incurred in connection with the Application will be approximately $120,000.  
Due notice of the filing of the Application has been given in the manner prescribed by rule 23 under the Act, and no hearing has been requested of or ordered by the Commission.  Based on the facts in the record, the Commission finds that, except as to those matters over which jurisdiction is reserved, the applicable standards of the Act are satisfied and that no adverse findings are necessary.
IT IS ORDERED, that jurisdiction be released over the retention of CenterPoint Energy Investment Management, Inc., MRT Services Company and CenterPoint Energy Trading and Transportation Group, Inc.
IT IS FURTHER ORDERED, under the applicable provisions of the Act and rules under the Act, that, except as to matters as to which jurisdiction has been reserved, the Application, as amended, be granted and permitted to become effective immediately, subject to the terms and conditions prescribed in rule 24 under the Act as delineated below.
IT IS FURTHER ORDERED that CenterPoint will continue to file certificates under rule 24 with the Commission within 60 days after the end of the first three calendar quarters and within 90 days after the end of the last calendar quarter in which transactions occur.  
A copy of relevant documents (e.g., underwriting agreements, indentures, bank agreements) for the relevant quarter shall be filed with, or incorporated by reference from 1933 Act or 1934 Act filings in such rule 24 certificates. 
The rule 24 certificates will contain the following information as of the end of the applicable quarter (unless otherwise stated below):

 The sales of any common stock or preferred or equity-linked securities by CenterPoint or a Subsidiary and the purchase price per share and the market price per share at the date of the agreement of sale;
 The total number of shares of CenterPoint common stock issued or issuable pursuant to options granted during the quarter under employee benefit plans and dividend reinvestment plans, including any employee benefit plans or dividend reinvestment plans hereafter adopted;
 If CenterPoint common stock has been transferred to a seller of securities of a company being acquired, the number of shares so issued, the value per share and whether the shares are restricted in the hands of the acquirer;
 If a guarantee is issued during the quarter, the name of the guarantor, the name of the beneficiary of the guarantee and the amount, terms and purpose of the guarantee;
 The amount and terms of any long-term debt issued by CenterPoint during the quarter, and the aggregate amount of short-term debt outstanding as of the end of the quarter, as well as the weighted average interest rate for such short-term debt as of such date;
 The amount and terms of any long-term debt issued by any Utility Subsidiary during the quarter, and the aggregate amount of short-term debt outstanding as of the end of the quarter, as well as the weighted average interest rate for such short-term debt as of such date;
 The amount and terms of any financings consummated by any Nonutility Subsidiary that are not exempt under rule 52;
 The notional amount and principal terms of any Hedging Instruments or Anticipatory Hedges entered into during the quarter and the identity of the other parties to the instruments; 
 The name, parent company and amount of equity in any intermediate subsidiary during the quarter and the amount and terms of any securities issued by such subsidiaries during the quarter;
 The information required by a Certificate of Notification on Form U-6B-2;16
 The amount and terms of any other securities issued under the authority sought herein during the quarter;
 Consolidated balance sheets for CenterPoint and/or a Utility Subsidiary as of the end of the quarter and separate balance sheets as of the end of the quarter for each company that has engaged in jurisdictional financing transactions during the quarter;
 A table showing, as of the end of the quarter, the dollar and percentage components of the capital structure of CenterPoint on a consolidated basis and of each Utility Subsidiary; 
 A retained earnings analysis of CenterPoint on a consolidated basis and of each Utility Subsidiary detailing gross earnings, dividends paid out of each capital account and the resulting capital account balances at the end of the quarter;
 A table showing, as of the end of the quarter, the Money Pool participants and amount of outstanding borrowings for each; 
 As to each Financing Subsidiary, (a) the name of the subsidiary; (b) the value of CenterPoint's investment account in such subsidiary; (c) the balance sheet account where the investment and the cost of the investment are booked; (d) the amount invested in the subsidiary by CenterPoint; (e) the type of corporate entity; (f) the percentage owned by CenterPoint; (g) the identification of other owners if not 100% owned by CenterPoint; (h) the purpose of the investment in the subsidiary; and (i) the amounts and types of securities to be issued by the subsidiary; 
 A confidential exhibit updating CenterPoint's financial projections and assumptions through 2006;
  With respect to any internal reorganization of any Subsidiaries during the quarter, a description of the nature of such reorganization; and 
 A report of service transactions among CenterPoint (or any other system service provider) and the Utility Subsidiaries containing the following information:  (a) a narrative description of the services rendered; (b) disclosure of the dollar amount of services rendered in (a) above according to category or department; (c) identification of companies rendering services described in (a) above and recipient companies, including disclosure of the allocation of services costs; and (d) disclosure of the number of CenterPoint system employees engaged in rendering services to other CenterPoint system companies on an annual basis, stated as an absolute and as a percentage of total employees.

In addition, Applicants shall file a report with the Commission within two business days after the occurrence of any of the following: (a) a 10% or greater decline in common stock equity for U.S. GAAP purposes since the end of the last reporting period for CenterPoint or any of the Utility Subsidiaries; (b) CenterPoint or any of the Utility Subsidiaries defaults on any debt obligation in principal amount equal to or exceeding $10 million if the default permits the holder of the debt obligation to demand payment; (c) an NRSRO has downgraded the senior debt ratings of CenterPoint or any of the Utility Subsidiaries; or (d) any event that would have a material adverse effect on the ability of CenterPoint or any of its subsidiaries to comply with any condition or requirement in this order on an ongoing basis.  The report shall describe all material circumstances giving rise to the event.
IT IS FURTHER ORDERED that jurisdiction is reserved, pending completion of the record, over: (1) the issuance of securities subject to the Investment Grade Ratings Criteria where one or more of the Investment Grade Ratings Criteria are not met; (2) CenterPoint's request for authority to declare and pay dividends out of capital or unearned surplus in an amount up to $500 million; (3) CenterPoint's sale of the stock and/or assets of the Texas Genco Entities to Reliant Resources; (4) CenterPoint's request to form and capitalize one or more special-purpose subsidiaries of the T&D Utility to issue securitization bonds to monetize and recover the balance of stranded costs relating to previously owned electric generation assets and other qualified costs as determined in a 2004 true-up proceeding; (5) the findings to enable CenterPoint to obtain the tax treatment provided by section 1081 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, in connection with the ordered disposition of MRT Services Company; (6) $478 million of the CenterPoint Additional Debt Limit; (7) $250 million of the T&D Utility Additional Debt Limit; and (8) the issuance of GasCo external debt securities in the amount of $500 million, the GasCo Additional Debt Limit.
For the Commission, by the Division of Investment Management, pursuant to delegated authority. 



Margaret H. McFarland
	    Deputy Secretary
	



 


1  Texas Genco, T&D Utility and GasCo shall collectively be referred to as the "Utility Subsidiaries."  Utility Holding, LLC, Texas Genco Holdings, Inc. and Texas Genco GP, LLC, shall collectively be referred to as the "Intermediate Holding Companies."  All of CenterPoint's direct and indirect subsidiaries, other than the Utility Subsidiaries and the Intermediate Holding Companies, are referred to as the "Nonutility Subsidiaries."  The Utility Subsidiaries, Nonutility Subsidiaries and Intermediate Holding Companies are collectively referred to as the "Subsidiaries."
2  Holding Co. Act Release No. 27683.
3  Holding Co. Act Release No. 27548.
4  Issuance Expenses will not count toward the effective cost of money discussed above.
5  CenterPoint states that, net of securitization debt, it's projected equity capitalization will be 30% or greater by the end of 2006.
6  Any convertible or equity-linked securities would be convertible into or linked to only securities that CenterPoint and its Subsidiaries are otherwise authorized to issue pursuant to rule or Commission order.
7  Each share of common stock includes one right ("Right") to purchase from CenterPoint a unit consisting of one one-thousandth of a share of CenterPoint Series A Preferred Stock at a purchase price of $42.50 per unit, subject to adjustment.  The Rights are issued pursuant to the Rights Agreement dated as of January 1, 2002 between CenterPoint and JPMorgan Chase Bank (the "Rights Agreement").
8  These plans include the CenterPoint Energy, Inc. Investor's Choice Plan; existing stock-related employee plans: CenterPoint Energy, Inc. Savings Plan, CenterPoint Energy, Inc. Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan, CenterPoint Energy, Inc. 1994 Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan, Long-Term Incentive Plan of CenterPoint Energy, Inc., CenterPoint Energy, Inc. Business Unit Performance Share Plan, CenterPoint Energy, Inc. and Subsidiaries Common Stock Participation Plan for Designated New Employees and Non-Officer Employees, and the CenterPoint Energy, Inc. Stock Plan for Outside Directors (collectively, the "Stock Based Plans").  The requested authority relating to benefit and compensation plans is intended to apply to these plans, as they may be amended or supplemented from time to time, and similar plans or arrangements that may be adopted in the future without any additional prior Commission order.
9  The Nonutility Subsidiaries will rely on rules 45 and 52 under the Act for financings described in this section.
10  To the extent that GasCo issues secured debt, such debt will be secured by a pledge of the stock of its nonutility subsidiary companies.
11  The Parties to the Money Pool will be CenterPoint, Texas Genco Holdings, Inc., Texas Genco GP, LLC, the Utility Subsidiaries, Houston Industries FinanceCo GP, LLC, Houston Industries FinanceCo LP, Reliant Energy FinanceCo II GP, LLC, Reliant Energy FinanceCo II LP, CenterPoint Energy Properties, Inc., CenterPoint Energy International, Inc., CenterPoint Energy Products, Inc., CenterPoint Energy Management Services, Inc. and CenterPoint Energy Funding Company.  CenterPoint Energy International, Inc. and CenterPoint Energy Funding Company are entities through which CenterPoint funded or acquired foreign utility companies within the meaning of section 33 of the Act and so, these companies will be investors in but not borrowers from the Money Pool.  No exempt wholesale generator ("EWG") or foreign utility company will be a borrower from the Money Pool.
12  This request is in addition to the request for authority in connection with the securitization of stranded costs infra. section VI.  Applicants are requesting the Commission to reserve jurisdiction over that request, pending completion of the record.
13  See e.g., Exelon Corp., Holding Co. Act Release No. 27256 (Oct. 19, 2000).
14  As discussed in section VII, infra., CenterPoint is in the process of preparing a request for authorization to form a service company.
15  As of December 31, 2002, the amount of CenterPoint's aggregate investment in EWGs and foreign utility companies ("FUCOs") was approximately $8 million.  As a result of the restructuring, CenterPoint had negative retained earnings as of December 31, 2002.  Thus, CenterPoint is not in compliance with the requirements of rule 53(a)(1).
16  Under the July Order, Applicants are exempt from the requirement to file Forms U-6B-2 because the information contained therein will be set forth in their quarterly rule 24 certificates.

 

http://www.sec.gov/divisions/investment/opur/filing/35-27692.htm




Home | Previous Page
Modified: 08/05/2003













Vincennes University (Vincennes) - Course Hero












































Find Study Resources

 Main Menu
by School

by Subject

by Book

Literature Study Guides
Infographics



Get Instant Tutoring Help

 Main Menu
Ask a Tutor a Question


Use Flashcards

 Main Menu
View Flashcards

Create Flashcards


Earn by Contributing

 Main Menu
Earn Free Access

Upload Documents

Write Course Advice

Refer Your Friends

Earn Money

Upload Documents

Create Q&A Pairs

Become a Tutor

Scholarships














Find
                        Study Resources 





by School


by Subject


by Book



Literature Study Guides


Infographics










Get Instant
                        Tutoring Help 





Ask a Tutor a Question








Use
                        Flashcards 





View Flashcards


Create Flashcards








Earn by
                        Contributing 





                                                            Earn Free AccessLearn More >


Upload Documents


Write Course Advice


Refer Your Friends


                                                            Earn MoneyLearn More >


Upload Documents


Create Q&A Pairs


Become a Tutor


                                                            ScholarshipsLearn More >






Are you an educator?
Log in
Sign up 








Home


Schools


Vincennes






* We aren't endorsed by this school




Vincennes University (Vincennes) **
School Info 
Vincennes University (Vincennes) has 75 departments in Course Hero with 1,182 documents and 24 answered questions.




Vincennes, Indiana





Application





Enrolled Students:
 19,205


Enrolled Undergraduates:
 19,205


Source
								National Center for Education Statistics (NCES), Institute of Education Sciences, 2014 - 2015. Course Hero, Inc. does not independently verify the accuracy of the information presented.




* We aren't endorsed by this school




 


Popular Departments


ACCT


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


431 Documents 3 Q&As 


CHEM


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


87 Documents 6 Advice 


ENGL


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


73 Documents 8 Advice 


MGMT


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


56 Documents 12 Q&As 1 Advice 


ENG

62 Documents 


BIOL


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


44 Documents 1 Q&A 7 Advice 







Find your department








All Departments (75)
'{[deptFilter.toUpperCase()]}' Departments ({[filteredDepartments.length]})


All
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
0-9








ACCT


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


431 Documents 3 Q&As 


AFLT


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Advice 


AGBS


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Advice 


AMNT


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Advice 


ARCH


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


4 Advice 


ARTT


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


3 Advice 


ASLG


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


12 Documents 3 Advice 


AUTO


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


3 Advice 


BCOM

10 Documents 


BCST


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Advice 


BIOL


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


44 Documents 1 Q&A 7 Advice 


BLAW


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


24 Documents 1 Q&A 


BMR

1 Document 


BODY


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Advice 


BUSINESS

2 Documents 1 Advice 


CDFS

10 Documents 


CHEM


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


87 Documents 6 Advice 


CIMT


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


3 Advice 


CIS

9 Documents 


CMET


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


13 Documents 


COMM

1 Document 


COMP


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


7 Documents 1 Q&A 1 Advice 


CORR


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Advice 


CPNS


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


12 Documents 


DESN


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


10 Documents 1 Advice 


DRAF


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


6 Documents 


ECON


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


28 Documents 1 Q&A 1 Advice 


EDUC


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Document 1 Advice 


ELEC


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


22 Documents 


EMAP


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


10 Documents 


EMTB


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


2 Advice 


ENG

62 Documents 


ENGL


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


73 Documents 8 Advice 


ENGLISH

2 Documents 


ENVIORNMEN

1 Document 


ERTH


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


25 Documents 2 Advice 


FACS


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


29 Documents 1 Advice 


FINANCIAL 

1 Document 1 Q&A 


FIRE


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Advice 


FUNERAL

1 Advice 


HIMT


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Document 1 Advice 


HIST


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


2 Documents 1 Q&A 2 Advice 


HLTH


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Advice 


HSPS


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


4 Documents 


HUMH


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Advice 


LAW

23 Documents 1 Q&A 


LAWC


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Document 2 Advice 


LAWE


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


3 Advice 


LFSC


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


8 Documents 1 Advice 


LITR


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


4 Documents 2 Advice 


MARKETING

1 Advice 


MATH


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


12 Documents 1 Q&A 7 Advice 


MATT


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


2 Advice 


MGMT


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


56 Documents 12 Q&As 1 Advice 


MUSA


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Advice 


MUSI


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


2 Documents 


MUSM


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


2 Advice 


NURS


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


39 Documents 3 Advice 


OADM


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


10 Documents 1 Q&A 3 Advice 


PFWL


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


4 Documents 


PHIL


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Document 1 Q&A 1 Advice 


PHYS


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


16 Documents 1 Advice 


PRDM


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


10 Documents 


PSYC


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


14 Documents 1 Q&A 15 Advice 


PSYCHOLOGY

1 Document 3 Advice 


RADG


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


2 Advice 


REST


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


1 Advice 


SCIENCE

9 Documents 


SOCL


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


7 Documents 1 Advice 


SPAN


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


5 Documents 2 Advice 


SPCH


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


3 Documents 2 Advice 


SSKL


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


3 Documents 


TEč

9 Documents 


TECH


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


5 Documents 1 Advice 


THEA


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


2 Advice 





							{[ dept.deptAcro ]}
						

							{[ dept.deptAcro ]}
						


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


{[ dept.numDocs | number:0 ]} Document{[dept.numDocs>1?'s':'']}
{[ dept.numQa | number:0 ]} Q&A{[dept.numQa>1?'s':'']}
{[ dept.numFlashcardSets | number:0 ]} Flashcard{[dept.numFlashcardSets>1?'s':'']}
{[ dept.numCourseAdvice | number:0 ]} Advice



{[ filteredDepartmentsMessage ]}





Vincennes School Information



School Facts 
Admissions 
Tuition, Cost and Financial Aid 
Students 






School Facts 



Operating Status: Currently operating Campus: Main campus (and distance learning)
Institution Type: 1 

Degree Type:
Highest Degree —Bachelor's Degree Predominant Degree —Graduate Distance Education: On-campus and Online





Admissions 





Admission Requirement





Secondary School Record Secondary School GPA Secondary School Rank Letters of Recommendation Admission Test Score AP Credits 

Not Applicable Not Applicable Not Applicable Not Applicable Not Applicable Yes 







Academics 

Degree Details
Available Fields of Study and Degrees

> Accounting and Business/Management
                            


> Accounting Technology/Technician and Bookkeeping
                            


> Administrative Assistant and Secretarial Science, General
                            


> Agricultural Business and Management, General
                            


> Agricultural Engineering
                            


> Agriculture, General
                            


> Aircraft Powerplant Technology/Technician
                            


> Airline/Commercial/Professional Pilot and Flight Crew
                            


> American Sign Language (ASL)
                            


> Anthropology
                            


> Applied Horticulture/Horticulture Operations, General
                            


> Architectural Drafting and Architectural CAD/CADD
                            


> Art Teacher Education
                            


> Art Therapy/Therapist
                            


> Art/Art Studies, General
                            


> Autobody/Collision and Repair Technology/Technician
                            


> Automobile/Automotive Mechanics Technology/Technician
                            


> Avionics Maintenance Technology/Technician
                            


> Banking and Financial Support Services
                            


> Behavioral Sciences
                            


> Biological and Biomedical Sciences, Other
                            


> Biology/Biological Sciences, General
                            


> Building/Construction Finishing, Management, and Inspection, Other
                            


> Business Administration and Management, General
                            


> Business Teacher Education
                            


> Business/Commerce, General
                            


> Carpentry/Carpenter
                            


> Chemical Engineering
                            


> Chemistry, General
                            


> Chemistry, Other
                            


> Child Care and Support Services Management
                            


> Civil Engineering, General
                            


> Commercial and Advertising Art
                            


> Communications Technologies/Technicians and Support Services, Other
                            


> Computer and Information Sciences, General
                            


> Computer Programming/Programmer, General
                            


> Computer Systems Networking and Telecommunications
                            


> Computer/Information Technology Services Administration and Management, Other
                            


> Construction Trades, General
                            


> Corrections
                            


> Cosmetology/Cosmetologist, General
                            


> Criminal Justice/Police Science
                            


> Culinary Arts/Chef Training
                            


> Dance, Other
                            


> Data Processing and Data Processing Technology/Technician
                            


> Diesel Mechanics Technology/Technician
                            


> Dietetics/Dietitian
                            


> Drama and Dramatics/Theatre Arts, General
                            


> Early Childhood Education and Teaching
                            


> Economics, General
                            


> Electrical and Electronics Engineering
                            


> Electrical, Electronic and Communications Engineering Technology/Technician
                            


> Electrician
                            


> Elementary Education and Teaching
                            


> Emergency Medical Technology/Technician (EMT Paramedic)
                            


> Engineering Science
                            


> Engineering Technology, General
                            


> English Language and Literature, General
                            


> English/Language Arts Teacher Education
                            


> Entrepreneurship/Entrepreneurial Studies
                            


> Family and Consumer Sciences/Home Economics Teacher Education
                            


> Family and Consumer Sciences/Human Sciences, General
                            


> Fashion Merchandising
                            


> Fire Science/Fire-fighting
                            


> Food Preparation/Professional Cooking/Kitchen Assistant
                            


> Food Science
                            


> Foreign Languages and Literatures, General
                            


> Funeral Service and Mortuary Science, General
                            


> General Merchandising, Sales, and Related Marketing Operations, Other
                            


> General Office Occupations and Clerical Services
                            


> Geological and Earth Sciences/Geosciences, Other
                            


> Graphic and Printing Equipment Operator, General Production
                            


> Health and Physical Education/Fitness, General
                            


> Health Information/Medical Records Technology/Technician
                            


> Health/Health Care Administration/Management
                            
                            Bachelor's Program                            

> Health/Medical Preparatory Programs, Other
                            


> Heating, Air Conditioning, Ventilation and Refrigeration Maintenance Technology/
                            


> History, General
                            


> Hospitality Administration/Management, General
                            


> Hotel/Motel Administration/Management
                            


> Human Services, General
                            


> Industrial Technology/Technician
                            
                            Bachelor's Program                            

> Journalism
                            


> Legal Assistant/Paralegal
                            


> Liberal Arts and Sciences, General Studies and Humanities, Other
                            


> Liberal Arts and Sciences/Liberal Studies
                            


> Licensed Practical/Vocational Nurse Training
                            


> Logistics, Materials, and Supply Chain Management
                            


> Manufacturing Engineering Technology/Technician
                            


> Massage Therapy/Therapeutic Massage
                            


> Mathematics Teacher Education
                            
                            Bachelor's Program                            

> Mathematics, General
                            


> Mechanical Drafting and Mechanical Drafting CAD/CADD
                            


> Mechanical Engineering
                            


> Medical Insurance Coding Specialist/Coder
                            


> Medical Office Assistant/Specialist
                            


> Medical Radiologic Technology/Science - Radiation Therapist
                            


> Mining Technology/Technician
                            


> Music Performance, General
                            


> Music Teacher Education
                            


> Natural Resources/Conservation, General
                            


> Occupational Therapy/Therapist
                            


> Pharmacy Technician/Assistant
                            


> Philosophy
                            


> Photojournalism
                            


> Physical Education Teaching and Coaching
                            


> Physical Sciences
                            


> Physical Therapy Technician/Assistant
                            


> Plumbing Technology/Plumber
                            


> Political Science and Government, General
                            


> Pre-Dentistry Studies
                            


> Pre-Medicine/Pre-Medical Studies
                            


> Pre-Pharmacy Studies
                            


> Pre-Veterinary Studies
                            


> Psychology, General
                            


> Public Relations/Image Management
                            


> Radio and Television Broadcasting Technology/Technician
                            


> Recording Arts Technology/Technician
                            


> Registered Nursing/Registered Nurse
                            
                            Bachelor's Program                            

> Restaurant, Culinary, and Catering Management/Manager
                            


> Science Teacher Education/General Science Teacher Education
                            
                            Bachelor's Program                            

> Secondary Education and Teaching
                            


> Securities Services Administration/Management
                            
                            Bachelor's Program                            

> Security and Loss Prevention Services
                            


> Sheet Metal Technology/Sheetworking
                            


> Social Sciences, General
                            


> Social Work
                            


> Sociology
                            


> Special Education and Teaching, General
                            
                            Bachelor's Program                            

> Sport and Fitness Administration/Management
                            


> Substance Abuse/Addiction Counseling
                            


> Surgical Technology/Technologist
                            


> Surveying Technology/Surveying
                            


> Technical Theatre/Theatre Design and Technology
                            


> Tool and Die Technology/Technician
                            


> Truck and Bus Driver/Commercial Vehicle Operator and Instructor
                            


> Web Page, Digital/Multimedia and Information Resources Design
                            


> Web/Multimedia Management and Webmaster
                            


> Welding Technology/Welder
                            







Highest Degree Academic and Career Counselling Services Employment Services for Students Placement Services for Graduate 

Bachelor's Degree Yes Yes Yes 






Tuition, Cost and Financial Aid 



Undergraduate Tuition


In-State Tuition (2014-2015)
$4,752.00


Out-of-State Tuition (2014-2015)
$11,812.00




Undergraduate Costs of Attendance


On—Campus


Total In-State Cost
$13,484.00


Total Out-of-State Cost
$20,544.00





Financial Aid — Freshmen Students
                                                                




Type of Aid
No. Receiving Aid % Receiving Aid Total Aid Received Average Aid Received 

Any Student Financial Aid
2,037 90% $395,127.00 $3,275.00 

Grant Aid
1,692 75% $10,198,242.00 $2,620.00 

Student Loan
- 68% $358,566.00 $4,373.00 



Financial Aid — Undergraduate Students
                                                                    




Type of Aid
No. Receiving Aid % Receiving Aid Total Aid Received Average Aid Received 

Any Student Financial Aid
5,744 31% $57,965,390.00 $10,091.00 

Pell Grant Aid
3,867 21% $15,405,861.00 $3,984.00 

Student Loan
4,373 24% $30,776,126.00 $7,038.00 



Net Price




Year
Income < 30K
Income 30K — 48K
Income 48K — 75K
Income 75K — 110K
Income > 110K


2014-2015 $8,743.00 $10,136.00 $13,551.00 $15,005.00 $15,472.00 

2013-2014 $8,770.00 $9,913.00 $13,431.00 $14,844.00 $15,198.00 

2012-2013 $8,301.00 $10,258.00 $13,597.00 $14,447.00 $14,616.00 






Students 




Student-Faculty Ratio
17 : 1




















:



Endowment per FTE Enrollment

$3,514
per student






Demographics









Source: National Center for Education Statistics (NCES), Institute of Education Sciences, 2014 - 2015
Course Hero, Inc. does not independently verify the accuracy of the information presented above.




Vincennes Documents (1,182)
Master your classes with homework help, exam study guides, past papers, and more for Vincennes.

 All 
 Assessments 
 Assignments 
 Essays 
 Homework Help 
 Lab Reports 
 Lecture Slides 
 Lesson Plans 
 Notes 
 Reading Lists 
 Rubrics 
 Syllabi 
 Test Prep 


 
Most Recent Documents for Vincennes
View all 






5 pages





                   Small Business Development week 2.docx
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Personal Financial Management
            

                                    ECON 208
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Small Business Development
1
Week 2 Individual Project
Ian Williams
Small Business Development
LCBM490 - 7A
Le Cordon Bleu College of Culinary Arts
Small Business Development
2
What is the business opportunity?
The business opportunity is to support fast 
            

Register Now



Small Business Development week 2.docx







7 pages





                   apa book Review.docx
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Personal Financial Management
            

                                    ECON 208
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Lanaya Moreno
1443746
1
This book review will be one the book Embedded Sustainability: The Next Big Competitive
advantage by Chris Laszlo and Nayda Zhexembayeva. We will begin by talking about the
authors. Chris Laszlo who has written other books on susta
            

Register Now



apa book Review.docx







11 pages





                   buffalo chicken dip.doc
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Personal Financial Management
            

                                    ECON 208
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Page |1
Buffalo Chicken Dip
Lanaya Moreno
Martie Schrimsher
01/12/16
Page |2
I have a faced paced bar and grill called Kajun Cuisine and we specialize mainly in bar
foods including burgers, fries, subs, sliders, various appetizers and wings. My number one
            

Register Now



buffalo chicken dip.doc







1 pages





                   bribery.docx
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Personal Financial Management
            

                                    ECON 208
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    As a United States citizen and business owner you are aware that any forms of bribery and or price fixing
are illegal even if you are in another country. If bribery or price fixing has been conducted then you can
face serious consequences such as jail tim
            

Register Now



bribery.docx







1 pages





                   What are the 3 major sections on a statement of cash flows.docx
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Personal Financial Management
            

                                    ECON 208
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    When trying to understand a cash flow statement first you must know what it is used for. A cash
flow statement helps you break down your cost and know how much money a business is
generating. The cash flow also allows you to see where your money is being 
            

Register Now



What are the 3 major sections on a statement of cash flows.docx







1 pages





                   Based on my finding I have concluded that there is a knowledge gap from the employee.docx
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Personal Financial Management
            

                                    ECON 208
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Based on my finding I have concluded that there is a knowledge gap from the employee. He or she
doesnt know how to do the job properly and isnt performing as expected. I would take the employee
and go over job descriptions with them to figure out what on 
            

Register Now



Based on my finding I have concluded that there is a knowledge gap from the employee.docx







5 pages





                   Small Business Development week 1.docx
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Personal Financial Management
            

                                    ECON 208
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Small Business Development
1
Week 1 Individual Project
Ian Williams
Small Business Development
LCBM490 - 7A
Le Cordon Bleu College of Culinary Arts
Small Business Development
2
With clean eating on the rise and people are more concerned with what they are
            

Register Now



Small Business Development week 1.docx







1 pages





                   3 food choices.docx
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Personal Financial Management
            

                                    ECON 208
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    My first choice would be to do a barbecue pork spare rib. My first step in the process would be to
remove the membrane of the spare ribs so I could let the seasoning sit on the actual ribs themselves for
a few hours in the fridge covered up for at least 1
            

Register Now



3 food choices.docx







1 pages





                   Around 8000 B.docx
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Personal Financial Management
            

                                    ECON 208
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Around 8000 B.C early hunters were store fruits and grains not knowing that they were going
bad as we would say now. When this started to happening alcoholic beverages were being
created unbeknownst to us. While beer and wine take two different types of s
            

Register Now



Around 8000 B.docx







1 pages





                   Ancient Egyptians.docx
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Personal Financial Management
            

                                    ECON 208
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Ancient Egyptians had vast amount of resources to them because of the Nile River. For the rich
and the poor different forms of bread were used in their diets. Often times they would fill the
breads with beans or vegetables for more substance. (Jimmy Dunn 
            

Register Now



Ancient Egyptians.docx







2 pages





                   alcholo storing policy.doc
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Personal Financial Management
            

                                    ECON 208
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    CAJUN CUISINE PROPER ALCOHOLIC PRODUCTS POLICY
Policy
Name:
ALCOHOLIC PRODUCTS POLICY
Approval
Authority:
Ian Williams
Adopted:
04/25/2016
Responsible
Executive:
Kyle Dawnson
Revised:
NA
Responsible
Office:
Purchasing, Storing and
Receiving Dept.
Contact:
            

Register Now



alcholo storing policy.doc







4 pages





                   0538473452_355598.doc
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Introduction to Payroll
            

                                    ACCT 143
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Cornerstones of Financial Accounting, 2nd edition
Rich/Jones/Mowen/Hansen
Check Figures
Check figures are given for selected exercises, problems, and cases
Chapter 7
7-17
Cost of land = $103,200
7-18
Cost of machine = $20,800
7-19
2011 credit to Accumulat
            

Register Now



0538473452_355598.doc







2 pages





                   ACCT 143 Assignment schedule due dates - Summer 2017(1).docx
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Introduction to Payroll
            

                                    ACCT 143
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    XI. Course Calendar/Schedule/Assignments Due by 11:59 pm on the due date listed.
Assignments will become zero after this date.
The instructional schedule below reflects expected class progress. The schedule is subject to change at
the instructors discreti
            

Register Now



ACCT 143 Assignment schedule due dates - Summer 2017(1).docx







2 pages





                   HSPS 310 CHAPTER 4 Assignment
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Homeland Security
            

                                    HSPS 310
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    CHAPTER 4
Introduction to Homeland Security
Chapter 4 Multiple Choice
1. The oldest and best known presidential instructions are:
a. executive orders.
b. military orders.
c. directives.
d. policies.
2. President Clintons main push on the War on Terrorism 
            

Register Now



HSPS 310 CHAPTER 4 Assignment







2 pages





                   HSPS 310 CHAPTER 2 Assignment
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Homeland Security
            

                                    HSPS 310
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    CHAPTER 2
Introduction to Homeland Security
Chapter 2 True-False
1. After its creation, the Department of Homeland Security became the second largest
department in the federal government.
a. True
b. False
2. The creation of the DHS was in the minds of man
            

Register Now



HSPS 310 CHAPTER 2 Assignment







3 pages





                   HSPS 310 CHAPTER 1 Assignment
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Homeland Security
            

                                    HSPS 310
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    CHAPTER 1
Introduction to Homeland Security
Chapter 1 Multiple Choice
1. Only the following ranked higher on the fear index than terrorism victimization:
a. crime against person.
b. burglary and auto theft.
c. crime against property.
d. robbery and auto t
            

Register Now



HSPS 310 CHAPTER 1 Assignment







4 pages





                   HistoryPresentation
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Graphic Design I
            

                                    DESN 125
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Maisie Lay
Graphic Design I
Prof. Wise
28 November 2016
Lou Dorfsman
Lou Dorfsman was born on April 24th, 1918, on the Lower East side of Manhattan. His
father, Samuel Dorfsman, a sign painter, and his mother, Molly Dorfsman, both immigrants from
poland, 
            

Register Now



HistoryPresentation







9 pages





                   History Presentation
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Graphic Design I
            

                                    DESN 125
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Lou Dorfsman
By: Maisie Lay
NYU
Cooper Union
Gastrotypographicalassemblage Wall
Sources:
"Lou Dorfsman." Wikipedia. Wikimedia Foundation, n.d. Web. 28 Nov. 2016.
"Lou Dorfsman: Designer of the Golden Age of CBS." Fanboycom RSS. N.p., n.d. Web. 28 Nov. 201
            

Register Now



History Presentation







1 pages





                   ColorWheel
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Graphic Design I
            

                                    DESN 125
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Maisie Lay

            

Register Now



ColorWheel







4 pages





                   HistoryPresentation
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Graphic Design I
            

                                    DESN 125
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Maisie Lay
Graphic Design I
Prof. Wise
28 November 2016
Lou Dorfsman
Lou Dorfsman was born on April 24th, 1918, on the Lower East side of Manhattan. His
father, Samuel Dorfsman, a sign painter, and his mother, Molly Dorfsman, both immigrants from
poland, 
            

Register Now



HistoryPresentation







1 pages





                   Colorchart_MaisieLay
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Graphic Design I
            

                                    DESN 125
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Maisie Lay

            

Register Now



Colorchart_MaisieLay







1 pages





                   110-ColorHarmonies-133
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Graphic Design I
            

                                    DESN 125
                                        -
                                        Fall 2016
                        

                    DESN110 Visual Design
Color Harmonies	
Color harmonies are color schemes or combinations of colors that create a harmonious effect. Colors that work well
together and are pleasing to the eye. These are general guidelines to help you get started in choosin
            

Register Now



110-ColorHarmonies-133







1 pages





                   110-ColoHamronyProject-163
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Graphic Design I
            

                                    DESN 125
                                        -
                                        Fall 2016
                        

                    DESN 110 Graphic Design I
Color Harmony/Contrast Design Project
OBJECTIVE	
Create interesting and appealing design that is suitable for demonstrating the different color harmonies and
color contrasts discussed in class to observe the effect color and valu
            

Register Now



110-ColoHamronyProject-163







1 pages





                   110-HistoryProject-163
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Graphic Design I
            

                                    DESN 125
                                        -
                                        Fall 2016
                        

                    DESN 110 Graphic Design I
Graphic Design History Project
OBJECTIVE	
Research and discover specific information about a particular graphic designer or art movement and share
what you have learned with the entire class. By doing this research, you will lear
            

Register Now



110-HistoryProject-163







1 pages





                   110-FinalProject-163
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Graphic Design I
            

                                    DESN 125
                                        -
                                        Fall 2016
                        

                    DESN 110 Graphic Design I
Final Project
OBJECTIVE	
Demonstrate all you have learned this semester about the design elements and design principles and their
interrelationships, while creating interesting and appealing designs that visually communicate abst
            

Register Now



110-FinalProject-163







1 pages





                   110-HistoryHandout-163
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Graphic Design I
            

                                    DESN 125
                                        -
                                        Fall 2016
                        

                    DESN110 Graphic Design I
History of Graphic Design - Overview
Major influences on the history of graphic design are:
	 Society moral beliefs, religion, politics, culture, fashion, etc.
	 Technology printing, photography, typesetting, computers, internet, 
            

Register Now



110-HistoryHandout-163







41 pages





                   Micro Study Guide
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Microeconomics
            

                                    ECON 201
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Micro Study Guide
What do economists mean when they state that a good is scarce?
a. There is a shortage or insufficient supply of the good at the existing price.
b. It is impossible to expand the availability of the good beyond the current amount.
c. Peop
            

Register Now



Micro Study Guide







1 pages





                   Untitled.png
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Accounting I
            

                                    ACCT 281
                                        -
                                        Summer 2017
                        

                    Attempt 1 cfw_of 1:.
 
Score: 19:20 Points 95 %
 Question 1 cfw_of 20) v 
1 _ Award: 1 outof1.0D point
Which of the following individuals has the most power to inuence corporate policy on a Iong-tenn basis?
0 . A shareholder owning 50% of the outstanding 
            

Register Now



Untitled.png







2 pages





                   Marine Enforcement1
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Marine Law
            

                                    LAW 101
                                        -
                                        Summer 2017
                        

                    Sept. 2nd, 2016
Marine Enforcement
Disaster Preparation
Numerous times all over the world disasters occur. Natural disasters things
like hurricanes, tornadoes, flooding and earthquakes. Every time a disaster hits
someone dies and another loses their home.
            

Register Now



Marine Enforcement1







1 pages





                   TECH 300 A & W
                


                        Vincennes
            

                    Workplace Diversity
            

                                    TECH 300
                                        -
                                        Spring 2014
                        

                    Jessica Flynn
TECH 300
Appearance and weight
1. Pros to larger customers having two seats is comfort the larger person and other
passengers. Planes are not very spacious anyways. Cons would be the cost of 2 tickets, it
is not cheap to fly and then to have
            

Register Now



TECH 300 A & W








Vincennes Questions & Answers



Showing 1 to 8 of 24
View all 












where are the most reliable scientific results published?
















To estimate the number of people without health insurance in a small town with a population of 10,000, 200 people, picked at random, were polled. Of these 200,
















would you please help with this assignment . Please see attached as well Please use this website for writing paper
















What are the three main objectives of packaging? Please explain and give examples to each.
















Briefly describe the three stages of brand loyalty.
















List and discuss the pros and cons of the four common sense approaches to determining a firm's promotional budget.
















List the six major elements of the physical distribution system along with the focus area for each.
















Describe the role of distribution channels in a firm's marketing strategy.











Vincennes Flashcards

 
Showing 1 to 0 of 0
View all 







Vincennes Courses with Advice


Showing 1 to {[ numOfCoursesWithAdviceToShow ]} of {[ totalNumCoursesWithAdvice ]}
View all 

Sort by:


{[$select.selected.label]}











								{[ courseWithAdvice.deptAcro + " " + courseWithAdvice.courseNum ]}
								{[ courseWithAdvice.courseName ]}
							


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog




(from {[ courseWithAdvice.numCourseAdvice ]} students)





Be the first to share words of wisdom!
You'll get $10 in tutor credits for sharing advice on 3 courses.
Give Advice





Vincennes Top Courses




											ACCT 511										
 (200 Documents)





											ACCT 260 - Cost Accounting										
 (132 Documents)





											CHEM 101 - Elementary Organic Chemistry and Biochemistry										
 (87 Documents)





											ENG 101										
 (62 Documents)





											ACCT 202 - MANAGERIAL ACCOUNTING										
 (60 Documents)





											MGMT 100 - Introduction to Business										
 (50 Documents)





											ENGL 101 - Intro to English										
 (43 Documents)





											ACCT 201 - Principles of Accounting I										
 (32 Documents)





											NURS 101 - Nursing Fundamentals Discussion										
 (30 Documents)





											BIOL 111 - Anatomy and Physiology I										
 (28 Documents)







Browse Schools















            Tweet
        








Ask a homework question
 - tutors are online











 






















 SECGems: Texas Genco Services, LP 







































  







			Data feeds now available
			Excel / CSV / Java / Python /etc 
Database
Learn more









  




  


  






























 Texas Genco Services, LP 
		     










 Info




 Ownership




 Filings
42













	 
	
	 211 CARNEGIE CENTER
	 
	
	
	   PRINCETON, 
	   NJ, 
	  
	
	  
		
		

			
			 
		
		
		
		 USA
		
	
	   609 524-4500    
	    

						        









Filing DateCurrent and former namesChanged on date




2006-11-09Texas Genco Services, LP








Central Index Key (CIK)
0001379857
State of Incorporation
TX
Country of Incorporation
USA
Fiscal year end
1231
IRS #
383694336










All related persons/companies# Filings





 ACE ENERGY, INC. (0001618641) 


13




 ALLIED HOME WARRANTY GP LLC (0001572059) 


9




 ALLIED WARRANTY LLC (0001572040) 


18




 ARTHUR KILL POWER LLC (0001114677) 


42




 ASTORIA GAS TURBINE POWER LLC (0001114678) 


42




 BAYOU COVE PEAKING POWER, LLC (0001618660) 


13




 BERRIANS I GAS TURBINE POWER LLC (0001286905) 


7




 BERTIANS I GAS TURBINE POWER LLC


7




 BIDURENERGY, INC. (0001618645) 


13




 BIG CAJUN II UNIT 4 LLC (0001286904) 


7




 CARBON MANAGEMENT SOLUTIONS LLC (0001508232) 


40




 CHICKAHOMINY RIVER ENERGY CORP (0001287244) 


2




 CIRRO ENERGY SERVICES, INC. (0001618646) 


13




 CIRRO GROUP INC (0001173247) 


13




 CLEAN EDGE ENERGY LLC (0001508233) 


40




 COMMONWEALTH ATLANTIC POWER LLC (0001286900) 


2




 CONEMAUGH POWER LLC (0001286903) 


42




 CONNECTICUT JET POWER LLC (0001114679) 


42




 COTTONWOOD DEVELOPMENT LLC (0001508212) 


40




 COTTONWOOD ENERGY CO LP (0001508217) 


40




 COTTONWOOD GENERATING PARTNERS I LLC (0001508214) 


40




 COTTONWOOD GENERATING PARTNERS II LLC (0001508215) 


40




 COTTONWOOD GENERATING PARTNERS III LLC (0001508216) 


40




 COTTONWOOD TECHNOLOGY PARTNERS LP (0001508218) 


40




 Cabrillo Power I, LLC (0001379860) 


42




 Cabrillo Power II, LLC (0001379861) 


42




 DEVON POWER LLC (0001114680) 


42




 DUNKIRK POWER LLC (0001114681) 


42




 EASTERN SIERRA ENERGY CO (0001286899) 


42




 EL SEGUNDO POWER II LLC (0001286898) 


42




 ELBOW CREEK WIND PROJECT LLC (0001508234) 


30




 ENERGY ALTERNATIVES WHOLESALE, LLC (0001571975) 


19




 ENERGY CHOICE SOLUTIONS LLC (0001691670) 


7




 ENERGY CURTAILMENT SPECIALISTS, INC. (0001618647) 


13




 ENERGY PLUS HOLDINGS LLC (0001534836) 


27




 ENERGY PLUS NATURAL GAS LLC (0001534869) 


22




 ENERGY PLUS NATURAL GAS LP (0001534869) 


27




 ENERGY PROTECTION INSURANCE CO (0001524689) 


35




 EVERYTHING ENERGY LLC (0001571978) 


19




 El Segundo Power, LLC (0001379862) 


42




 FORWARD HOME SECURITY, LLC (0001626916) 


10




 GCP Funding Company, LLC (0001379864) 


42




 GREEN MOUNTAIN ENERGY CO (0001170136) 


40




 GREEN MOUNTAIN ENERGY CO (NY COM) LLC (0001572031) 


19




 GREEN MOUNTAIN ENERGY CO (NY RES) LLC (0001572030) 


6




 GREGORY PARTNERS, LLC (0001618650) 


13




 GREGORY POWER PARTNERS, LLC (0001618651) 


13




 HANOVER ENERGY CO (0001286897) 


2




 HUNTLEY POWER LLC (0001114682) 


42




 Hoffman Summit Wind Project, LLC (0001380411) 


2




 Huntley IGCC, LLC (0001379865) 


7




 INDEPENDENCE ENERGY ALLIANCE LLC (0001534861) 


27




 INDEPENDENCE ENERGY GROUP LLC (0001534847) 


27




 INDEPENDENCE ENERGY NATURAL GAS LLC (0001534859) 


27




 INDIAN RIVER OPERATIONS INC (0001286896) 


42




 INDIAN RIVER POWER LLC (0001286895) 


42




 Indian River IGCC, LLC (0001379866) 


7




 JAMES RIVER POWER LLC (0001286894) 


7




 KAUFMAN COGEN LP (0001286893) 


2




 KEYSTONE POWER LLC (0001286892) 


42




 LONE STAR A/C & APPLIANCE REPAIR, LLC (0001572041) 


19




 LOUISANA GENERATING LLC (0001286891) 


1




 LOUISIANA GENERATING LLC (0001126955) 


41




 LS Power Management LLC (0001346864) 


1




 Lake Erie Properties, Inc. (0001380410) 


2




 Langford Wind Power, LLC (0001464203) 


40




 Long Beach Generation, LLC (0001379867) 


1




 MERIDEN GAS TURBINES LLC (0001524744) 


35




 MIDDLETOWN POWER LLC (0001114683) 


42




 MONTVILLE POWER LLC (0001114684) 


42




 Montville IGCC, LLC (0001379868) 


7




 NEO CALIFORNIA POWER LLC (0001286889) 


1




 NEO CHESTER GEN LLC (0001286888) 


2




 NEO CHESTER-GEN LLC (0001286888) 


2




 NEO CORP (0001286887) 


42




 NEO FREEHOLD GEN LLC (0001286965) 


38




 NEO FREEHOLD-GEN LLC (0001286965) 


38




 NEO LANDFILL GAS HOLDINGS INC (0001286963) 


1




 NEO Montauk Genco Management LLC (0001346865) 


1




 NEO POWER SERVICES INC (0001286960) 


42




 NORWALK POWER LLC (0001114685) 


42




 NRG ADVISORY SERVICES LLC (0001691671) 


7




 NRG AFFILIATE SERVICES INC (0001286950) 


42




 NRG ARTESIAN ENERGY LLC (0001508206) 


40




 NRG ARTHUR KILL OPERATIONS INC (0001286947) 


42




 NRG ASIA PACIFIC LTD


2




 NRG ASIA-PACIFIC, LTD (0001286944) 


2




 NRG ASTORIA GAS TURBINE OPERATIONS INC (0001286943) 


42




 NRG BAYOU COVE LLC (0001286942) 


42




 NRG Business Solutions LLC (0001572031) 


13




 NRG CABRILLO POWER OPERATIONS INC (0001286941) 


42




 NRG CADILLAC OPERATIONS INC (0001286938) 


2




 NRG CALIFORNIA PEAKER OPERATIONS LLC (0001286917) 


42




 NRG CONNECTED HOME LLC (0001626914) 


10




 NRG CONNECTICUT AFFILIATE SERVICES INC (0001286915) 


42




 NRG CURTAILMENT SOLUTIONS HOLDINGS LLC (0001618653) 


7




 NRG CURTAILMENT SOLUTIONS LLC (0001618653) 


13




 NRG CURTAILMENT SOLUTIONS, INC. (0001618647) 


7




 NRG Cedar Bayou Development Company, LLC (0001464204) 


40




 NRG Construction, LLC (0001464205) 


40




 NRG DEVON OPERATIONS INC (0001286914) 


42




 NRG DISPATCH SERVICES LLC (0001571962) 


19




 NRG DISTRIBUTED GENERATION PR LLC (0001626833) 


10




 NRG DUNKIRK OPERATIONS INC (0001286913) 


42




 NRG Development CO Inc. (0001346866) 


36




 NRG ECOKAP HOLDINGS LLC (0001691583) 


7




 NRG EL SEGUNDO OPERATIONS INC (0001286911) 


42




 NRG ENERGY EFFICIENCY-L LLC (0001626909) 


10




 NRG ENERGY EFFICIENCY-P LLC (0001626911) 


6




 NRG ENERGY LABOR SERVICES LLC (0001524694) 


35




 NRG ENERGY SERVICES GROUP LLC (0001524695) 


35




 NRG ENERGY SERVICES INTERNATIONAL INC. (0001618655) 


13




 NRG ENERGY SERVICES LLC (0001508221) 


40




 NRG ENERGY, INC. (0001013871) 


42




 NRG GREENCO LLC (0001691588) 


7




 NRG Generation Holdings, Inc. (0001379871) 


42




 NRG HOME & BUSINESS SOLUTIONS LLC (0001571961) 


19




 NRG HOME SOLUTIONS LLC (0001572014) 


19




 NRG HOME SOLUTIONS PRODUCT LLC (0001571960) 


19




 NRG HOMER CITY SERVICES LLC (0001572013) 


19




 NRG HQ DG LLC (0001626912) 


10




 NRG HUNTLEY OPERATIONS INC (0001286910) 


42




 NRG Home Services LLC (0001572041) 


7




 NRG IDENTITY PROTECT LLC (0001571959) 


19




 NRG ILION LIMITED PARTNERSHIP (0001524696) 


35




 NRG ILION LP LLC (0001524697) 


35




 NRG INTERNATIONAL LLC (0001286909) 


42




 NRG International II Inc. (0001346867) 


1




 NRG International III Inc. (0001346868) 


1




 NRG KAUFMAN LLC (0001286908) 


2




 NRG Latin America Inc. (0001346869) 


1




 NRG MAINTENANCE SERVICES LLC (0001524698) 


35




 NRG MESQUITE LLC (0001286901) 


2




 NRG MEXTRANS INC. (0001524699) 


35




 NRG MIDATLANTIC AFFILIATE SERVICES INC (0001286907) 


42




 NRG MIDDLETOWN OPERATIONS INC (0001286884) 


42




 NRG MONTVILLE OPERATIONS INC (0001286883) 


42




 NRG Marketing Services LLC (0001346870) 


1




 NRG NEW JERSEY ENERGY SALES LLC (0001286981) 


32




 NRG NEW ROADS HOLDINGS LLC (0001286980) 


42




 NRG NORTH CENTRAL OPERATIONS INC (0001286979) 


42




 NRG NORTHEAST AFFILIATE SERVICES INC (0001286972) 


42




 NRG NORWALK HARBOR OPERATIONS INC (0001286970) 


42




 NRG OPERATING SERVICES INC (0001286967) 


42




 NRG OSWEGO HARBOR POWER OPERATIONS INC (0001286983) 


42




 NRG PACGEN INC. (0001524700) 


35




 NRG POWER MARKETING INC (0001286982) 


42




 NRG POWER MARKETING LLC (0001286982) 


40




 NRG Portable Power LLC (0001571951) 


13




 NRG RELIABILITY SOLUTIONS LLC (0001572026) 


19




 NRG RENTER'S PROTECTION LLC (0001571955) 


19




 NRG RETAIL LLC (0001508257) 


40




 NRG RETAIL NORTHEAST LLC (0001618656) 


13




 NRG ROCKFORD ACQUISITION LLC (0001524701) 


35




 NRG ROCKY ROAD LLC (0001286986) 


2




 NRG SAGUARO OPERATIONS INC (0001286985) 


42




 NRG SECURITY LLC (0001571953) 


19




 NRG SIMPLYSMART SOLUTIONS LLC (0001524693) 


35




 NRG SOUTH CENTRAL AFFILIATE SERVICES INC (0001286988) 


42




 NRG SOUTH CENTRAL GENERATING LLC (0001124468) 


42




 NRG SOUTH CENTRAL OPERATIONS INC (0001286987) 


42




 NRG SPV #1 LLC (0001691589) 


7




 NRG Services CORP (0001346871) 


36




 NRG South Texas, LP (0001379872) 


42




 NRG TEXAS GREGORY LLC (0001575869) 


17




 NRG Texas C&I Supply LLC (0001464206) 


40




 NRG Texas Holding Inc. (0001464207) 


40




 NRG Texas Power, LLC (0001464208) 


40




 NRG Texas, LLC (0001379873) 


42




 NRG Texas, LP (0001379874) 


1




 NRG UNEMPLOYMENT PROTECTION LLC (0001571951) 


19




 NRG WARRANTY SERVICES LLC (0001572057) 


19




 NRG WEST COAST LLC (0001286989) 


42




 NRG WEST COST LLC


42




 NRG WESTERN AFFILIATE SERVICES INC (0001286990) 


42




 New Genco GP, LLC (0001379869) 


42




 New Genco LP, LLC (0001379870) 


1




 O'BRIEN COGENERATION, INC. II (0001524745) 


35




 ONSITE ENERGY, INC. (0001524809) 


35




 OSWEGO HARBOR POWER LLC (0001114686) 


42




 PENNYWISE POWER LLC (0001508219) 


21




 Padoma Wind Power, LLC (0001379875) 


2




 RE RETAIL RECEIVABLES, LLC (0001508225) 


40




 RELIANT ENERGY NORTHEAST LLC (0001524746) 


35




 RELIANT ENERGY POWER SUPPLY, LLC (0001508230) 


40




 RELIANT ENERGY RETAIL HOLDINGS LLC (0001255504) 


40




 RELIANT ENERGY RETAIL SERVICES LLC (0001255506) 


40




 RERH HOLDINGS, LLC (0001508213) 


40




 Reliant Energy Texas Retail LLC (0001464210) 


21




 SAGUARO POWER LLC (0001286993) 


42




 SOMERSET OPERATIONS INC (0001286991) 


42




 SOMERSET POWER LLC (0001114687) 


42




 San Juan Mesa Wind Project II LLC (0001380506) 


2




 TEXAS GENCO HOLDINGS INC (0001188303) 


42




 Texas Genco Financing Corp. (0001379876) 


42




 Texas Genco GP, LLC (0001379877) 


42




 Texas Genco LP, LLC (0001379859) 


42




 Texas Genco Operating Services, LLC (0001379858) 


42




 US RETAILERS LLC (0001572043) 


19




 VIENNA OPERATIONS INC (0001286995) 


42




 VIENNA POWER LLC (0001286906) 


42




 WCP (Generation) Holdings, LLC (0001379855) 


42




 West Coast Power, LLC (0001379854) 


42







 








db
 
 















































Energy Curtailment Specialists Inc NRG Energy Services Group LLC OBrien












































Find Study Resources

 Main Menu
by School

by Subject

by Book

Literature Study Guides
Infographics



Get Instant Tutoring Help

 Main Menu
Ask a Tutor a Question


Use Flashcards

 Main Menu
View Flashcards

Create Flashcards


Earn by Contributing

 Main Menu
Earn Free Access

Upload Documents

Write Course Advice

Refer Your Friends

Earn Money

Upload Documents

Create Q&A Pairs

Become a Tutor

Scholarships














Find
                        Study Resources 





by School


by Subject


by Book



Literature Study Guides


Infographics










Get Instant
                        Tutoring Help 





Ask a Tutor a Question








Use
                        Flashcards 





View Flashcards


Create Flashcards








Earn by
                        Contributing 





                                                            Earn Free AccessLearn More >


Upload Documents


Write Course Advice


Refer Your Friends


                                                            Earn MoneyLearn More >


Upload Documents


Create Q&A Pairs


Become a Tutor


                                                            ScholarshipsLearn More >






Are you an educator?
Log in
Sign up 








Home


Vincennes


ACCT


ACCT 511


NRGEnergyInc






                                                                                                Energy curtailment specialists inc nrg energy
                                                                                    




SCHOOL


Vincennes




COURSE TITLE


ACCT 511




TYPE
Homework Help


UPLOADED BY
thoufeeksa


PAGES
                264
            




Click to edit the document details







This preview shows
                                            pages
                                            209–212. Sign up
                                                to
                                                view the full content.

View Full Document 








Energy Curtailment Specialists, Inc. 
NRG Energy Services Group LLC 
O'Brien Cogeneration, Inc. II 
Energy Plus Holdings LLC 
NRG Energy Services International Inc. 
ONSITE Energy, Inc. 
Energy Plus Natural Gas LLC 
NRG Energy Services LLC 
Oswego Harbor Power LLC 
Energy Protection Insurance Company 
NRG Generation Holdings, Inc. 
RE Retail Receivables, LLC 
Everything Energy LLC 

Reliant Energy Northeast LLC 
Forward Home Security, LLC 
NRG Home Solutions LLC 
Reliant Energy Power Supply, LLC 
GCP Funding Company, LLC 
NRG Home Solutions Product LLC 
Reliant Energy Retail Holdings, LLC 
Green Mountain Energy Company 
NRG Homer City Services LLC 
Reliant Energy Retail Services, LLC 
Gregory Partners, LLC 
NRG Huntley Operations Inc. 
RERH Holdings LLC 
Gregory Power Partners LLC 
NRG HQ DG LLC 
Saguaro Power LLC 
Huntley Power LLC 
NRG Identity Protect LLC 
Somerset Operations Inc. 
Independence Energy Alliance LLC 
NRG Ilion Limited Partnership 
Somerset Power LLC 
Independence Energy Group LLC 
NRG Ilion LP LLC 
Texas Genco Financing Corp. 
Independence Energy Natural Gas LLC 
NRG International LLC 
Texas Genco GP, LLC 
Indian River Operations Inc. 
NRG Maintenance Services LLC 
Texas Genco Holdings, Inc. 
Indian River Power LLC 
NRG Mextrans Inc. 
Texas Genco LP, LLC 
Keystone Power LLC 
NRG MidAtlantic Affiliate Services Inc. 
Texas Genco Operating Services, LLC 
Langford Wind Power, LLC 
NRG Middletown Operations Inc. 
Texas Genco Services, LP 

NRG Montville Operations Inc. 
US Retailers LLC 
Louisiana Generating LLC 
NRG New Roads Holdings LLC 
Vienna Operations Inc. 
Meriden Gas Turbines LLC 
NRG North Central Operations Inc. 
Vienna Power LLC 
Middletown Power LLC 
NRG Northeast Affiliate Services Inc. 
WCP (Generation) Holdings LLC 
Montville Power LLC 
NRG Norwalk Harbor Operations Inc. 
West Coast Power LLC 
NEO Corporation 
204








This
                                                        preview
                                                        has intentionally blurred sections.
                                                        Sign up to view the full version.
View Full
                                                        Document











The non-guarantor subsidiaries include all of NRG's foreign subsidiaries and certain domestic subsidiaries, including GenOn and its subsidiaries. NRG 
conducts much of its business through and derives much of its income from its subsidiaries. Therefore, the Company's ability to make required payments with 
respect to its indebtedness and other obligations depends on the financial results and condition of its subsidiaries and NRG's ability to receive funds from its 
subsidiaries. Except for NRG Bayou Cove, LLC, which is subject to certain restrictions under the Company's Peaker financing agreements, there are no 
restrictions on the ability of any of the guarantor subsidiaries to transfer funds to NRG. In addition, there may be restrictions for certain non-guarantor 
subsidiaries. 
The following condensed consolidating financial information presents the financial information of NRG Energy, Inc., the guarantor subsidiaries and 
the non-guarantor subsidiaries in accordance with Rule 3-10 under the Securities and Exchange Commission's Regulation S-X. The financial information 








This
                                                        preview
                                                        has intentionally blurred sections.
                                                        Sign up to view the full version.
View Full
                                                        Document





                                    This is the end of the preview. Sign up
                                    to
                                    access the rest of the document.
                                





TERM
                Summer '15


PROFESSOR
AaronD.Bruck


TAGS

 Fiscal Year                                            






Click to edit the document details













Share this link with a friend:




Copied!










Report






 View Full
                                        Document
                                        





Most Popular Documents for ACCT 511






97 pages




            intro to Documentation
        

                        Vincennes
            



                                    ACCT 511
                                        -
                                        Summer 2015
                        

                    Acct 316
Acct 316
Acct 316
Acct 316
Acct 316
Acct 316
Acct 316
Systems Development
an
            


intro to Documentation
 








1 pages




            2014-04-28_093442_johnny
        

                        Vincennes
            



                                    ACCT 511
                                        -
                                        Summer 2015
                        

                    Johnny
Pretax Earnings
Add Warranty
;ess Gross Profit
less Depreciation
add Penalties
            


2014-04-28_093442_johnny
 








1 pages




            211939_split-0-page-3
        

                        Vincennes
            



                                    ACCT 511
                                        -
                                        Summer 2015
                        

                    1.The ratios of each COQ category to revenues and to b:tal quality costs for each
per
            


211939_split-0-page-3
 








1 pages




            Exercise_19_25_Q1
        

                        Vincennes
            



                                    ACCT 511
                                        -
                                        Summer 2015
                        

                    Exercise 19-25
Meyer reported the following pretax financial income (loss) for the ye
            


Exercise_19_25_Q1
 








88 pages




            Test Bank for Managerial Accounting 12th Edition Warren, Reeve, Duchac
        

                        Vincennes
            



                                    ACCT 511
                                        -
                                        Summer 2015
                        

                    download full file at http:/testbankcafe.com
Chapter 2-Job Order Costing
Student: _
1
            


Test Bank for Managerial Accounting 12th Edition Warren, Reeve, Duchac
 








9 pages




            Assignment Chapter 19_Answers
        

                        Vincennes
            



                                    ACCT 511
                                        -
                                        Summer 2015
                        

                    Assignment Chapter 19
True/False
Indicate whether the statement is true or false.
_F_
            


Assignment Chapter 19_Answers
 




View
                                        more










Study on the go

Download
                                            the iOS app
Download
                                            the Android app





Other Related Materials





110 pages




            Starbucks_10K_20151112
        

                        Texas A&M
            



                                    ACCT 647
                                        -
                                        Spring 2016
                        

                    Table of Contents
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, DC 205
            


Starbucks_10K_20151112
 






175 pages




            RL Venezuela Servicios Chipiga S de RL de CV Mexico Servicios Gamesa Puerto
        

                        Arizona
            



                                    ACCT 400A
                                        -
                                        Summer 2015
                        

                    Table of Contents
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 205
            


PepsiCo_10K_20150212
 






260 pages




            Operating profit grew 1 driven by the net revenue growth and planned cost
        

                        GWU
            



                                    ACCT 2002
                                        -
                                        Fall 2013
                        

                    Table of Contents
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, DC 205
            


PEP 10K
 






160 pages




            NOTE 12 STOCK COMPENSATION PLANS Our Company grants stock options and
        

                        University of Phoenix
            



                                    ACCOUNTING 290
                                        -
                                        Winter 2015
                        

                    UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
A
	
            


2014-annual-report-on-form-10-k
 






75 pages




            and all other documents in connection therewith with the Commission granting
        

                        Arizona
            



                                    ACCT 451
                                        -
                                        Fall 2014
                        

                    ALGT 2013 10K Doc
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
            


Allegiant
 






97 pages




            Grainger has centralized business support functions that provide coordination
        

                        Hofstra University
            



                                    ACCT 203
                                        -
                                        Fall 2015
                        

                    GWW.2013.12.31 - 10K
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C
            


779778
 










Page209 / 264


Energy Curtailment Specialists Inc NRG Energy Services...
This preview shows document pages 209 - 212. Sign up to view the full document.

 View Full Document 










Ask a homework question
 - tutors are online











 





















